Nebraska, session 109, LB684.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-2-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 27 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Juvenile Probation Administration Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Juvenile Probation Administration Act:
(1) Administrator means the Juvenile Probation Administrator;
(2) Agency means the Juvenile Probation Agency;
(3) Chief juvenile probation officer means the juvenile probation
officer in charge of a juvenile probation district;
(4) Juvenile has the same meaning as in section 43-245;
(5) Juvenile court has the same meaning as in section 43-245;
(6) Juvenile intake probation officer means an employee of the
system who is called upon by a law enforcement officer in accordance with
section 43-250 to make a decision regarding the furtherance of a
juvenile's detention;
(7) Juvenile probation officer means a probation officer who
supervises probationers;
(8) Non-probation-based program or service has the same meaning as
in section 29-2246;
(9) Probation means the supervision of a juvenile by a probation
officer as ordered by a juvenile court under the Nebraska Juvenile Code;
(10) Probationer or juvenile probationer means a juvenile on
probation; and
(11) System means the Nebraska Juvenile Probation System.
Sec. 3. The Juvenile Probation Agency is hereby created within the
executive branch of government. The agency shall consist of the Juvenile
Probation Administrator, the Nebraska Juvenile Probation System, and such
other employees as may be necessary to carry out the functions of the
system. The employees of the office shall be covered by the State
Personnel System.
Sec. 4. The agency shall:
(1) Supervise and administer the system;
(2) Establish probation policies and standards for the system, in
-3-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
consultation with the Supreme Court; and
(3) Supervise juveniles placed on probation.
Sec. 5. On or before July 1, 2026, the Governor shall appoint and
fix the salary of the Juvenile Probation Administrator subject to the
approval of a majority of the Legislature. The administrator shall be a
person with appropriate experience in the field of juvenile probation or
with training in relevant disciplines at a recognized college or
university. The administrator shall serve at the pleasure of the
Governor.
Sec. 6. The administrator shall:
(1) Supervise and administer the agency;
(2) Establish and maintain policies, standards, and procedures for
the system, in consultation with the Supreme Court;
(3) Prescribe and furnish such forms for records and reports for the
system as shall be deemed necessary for uniformity, efficiency, and
statistical accuracy;
(4) Establish minimum qualifications for employment as a juvenile
probation officer in this state and establish and maintain such
additional qualifications as the administrator deems appropriate for
appointment to the system. Such qualifications shall be established in
accordance with subsection (4) of section 8 of this act;
(5) Establish and maintain advanced periodic inservice training
requirements for the system;
(6) Organize and conduct training programs for juvenile probation
officers. Training shall include the proper use of a risk and needs
assessment, risk-based supervision strategies, relationship skills,
cognitive behavioral interventions, community-based resources, risk
factors, and targeting risk factors to reduce recidivism and the proper
use of the graduated response matrix of incentives provided for in
section 43-286.01. All juvenile probation officers shall complete the
training requirements set forth in this subdivision;
-4-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(7) Collect, develop, and maintain statistical information
concerning probationers, probation practices, and the operation of the
system;
(8) Interpret the probation program to the public with a view toward
developing a broad base of public support;
(9) Conduct research for the purpose of evaluating and improving the
effectiveness of the system. Subject to the availability of funding, the
administrator shall contract with an independent contractor or academic
institution for evaluation of existing facilities and programs operated
by the agency;
(10) Adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be
necessary or proper for the operation of the agency or system. The
administrator shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for
transitioning juvenile probationers across levels of supervision and
discharging them from supervision consistent with evidence-based
practices. The rules and regulations shall ensure supervision resources
are prioritized for individuals who are high risk to cause danger to
themselves or the public, require transitioning individuals down levels
of supervision intensity based on assessed risk and months of supervision
without a reported major violation, and establish incentives for earning
discharge from supervision based on compliance;
(11) Transmit a report during each even-numbered year to the Supreme
Court, the Legislature, and the Governor on the operation of the agency
for the preceding two calendar years which shall include a historical
analysis of juvenile probation officer workload, including participation
in non-probation-based programs and services. The report submitted to the
Clerk of the Legislature shall be submitted electronically. The
administrator shall provide any member of the Legislature with an
electronic copy of such report upon request;
(12) Administer the payment by the state of all salaries, travel,
and expenses authorized under section 29-2259 incident to the conduct and
-5-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
maintenance of the agency;
(13) Participate in the development, implementation, and evaluation
of non-probation-based programs and services for juveniles;
(14) Ensure that any risk or needs assessment instrument utilized by
the system be periodically validated, including the standardized juvenile
detention screening instrument provided for in section 43-260.01;
(15) Have the authority to enter into interlocal agreements in which
probation resources or probation personnel may be utilized in conjunction
with or as part of non-probation-based programs and services. Any such
interlocal agreement shall comply with section 9 of this act;
(16) Adopt and promulgate necessary rules and regulations; and
(17) Exercise all powers and perform all duties necessary and proper
to carry out the administrator's responsibilities.
Sec. 7. On January 15 and July 15 of each fiscal year, the
administrator shall electronically submit a report to the budget division
of the Department of Administrative Services, the Legislative Fiscal
Analyst, and the Supreme Court which shall include, but not be limited
to:
(1) The total number of juvenile cases supervised by the agency in
the previous six months; and
(2) The total number of juvenile intake screening interviews
conducted and detentions authorized by the agency in the previous six
months, using the detention screening instrument described in section
43-260.01.
Sec. 8. (1) The administrator, in consultation with the Supreme
Court, shall divide the state into juvenile probation districts and may
from time to time alter the boundaries of such districts in order to
maintain the most economical, efficient, and effective utilization of the
system.
(2) The administrator shall appoint temporary and permanent juvenile
probation officers and employees for each juvenile probation district as
-6-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
may be required to provide adequate probation services.
(3) The administrator shall appoint a chief juvenile probation
officer with the concurrence of the majority of all juvenile court judges
within a probation district.
(4) The administrator shall, with the concurrence of all of the
separate juvenile court judges within each separate juvenile court, (a)
appoint for each separate juvenile court a chief juvenile probation
officer, any deputy juvenile probation officers required, and such other
employees as may be required to provide adequate probation services for
such court and (b) set the salaries of such officers and employees. The
chief and deputy juvenile probation officers shall be selected with
reference to experience and understanding of problems of family life and
child welfare, juvenile delinquency, community organizations, and
training in the recognition and treatment of behavior disorders.
(5) An ex-offender released from a penal complex or a county jail
may be appointed to a position of deputy juvenile probation officer. Such
ex-offender shall maintain a record free of arrests, except for minor
traffic violations, for one year immediately preceding appointment.
(6) The administrator may direct a juvenile probation officer of one
juvenile probation district to temporarily act as juvenile probation
officer for a court in another district, and such probation officer while
so serving shall have all the powers and responsibilities as if such
officer were serving in the district to which he or she was originally
appointed.
(7) The administrator, in consultation with the Supreme Court, shall
designate the location of the principal office of the system within each
juvenile probation district.
Sec. 9. Any interlocal agreement authorized by subdivision (15) of
section 6 of this act shall require the political subdivision party to
the agreement to provide sufficient resources to cover a portion of the
costs associated with the participation of juvenile probation personnel
-7-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
or use of probation resources.
Sec. 10. Nothing in the Nebraska Juvenile Probation Administration
Act shall be construed to prohibit any court or the agency from utilizing
volunteers from the community for juvenile probation supervision. The
volunteer program shall be supervised by a full-time juvenile probation
officer who meets the minimum qualifications established by the agency.
Sec. 11. (1) The Nebraska Juvenile Probation System is established
which shall consist of the administrator, chief juvenile probation
officers, juvenile probation officers, and support staff.
(2) The system shall be responsible for:
(a) Juvenile intake services;
(b) Preadjudication juvenile supervision services under section
43-254;
(c) Direct supervision of juvenile probationers; and
(d) Implementation of non-probation-based programs and services
authorized by an interlocal agreement pursuant to subdivision (15) of
section 6 of this act.
(3) The system shall be sufficient in size to assure that no
juvenile probation officer carries a caseload larger than is compatible
with adequate probation investigation or supervision. Juvenile probation
officers shall be compensated with salaries substantially equal to other
state employees who have similar responsibilities. This provision for
salary equalization shall apply only to juvenile probation officers and
support staff and shall not apply to chief juvenile probation officers,
the administrator, any deputy administrators, or any other similar
management positions.
Sec. 12. A district juvenile probation officer shall:
(1) Conduct juvenile intake interviews and investigations in
accordance with sections 43-253 and 43-260.01 and supervise delivery of
preadjudication juvenile services under subdivision (1)(f) of section
43-254;
-8-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(2) Make other investigations, as may be required by law or directed
by a juvenile court in which the officer is serving;
(3) Supervise juvenile probationers in accordance with the rules and
regulations of the agency and the directions of the juvenile court;
(4) Advise the juvenile court, in accordance with the Nebraska
Juvenile Probation Administration Act and such rules and regulations of
the agency, of violations of the conditions of probation by individual
juvenile probationers;
(5) Advise the juvenile court, in accordance with the rules and
regulations of the agency and the direction of the court, when the
situation of a juvenile probationer may require a modification of the
conditions of probation or when a probationer's adjustment is such as to
warrant termination of probation;
(6) Provide each juvenile probationer with a statement of the period
and conditions of his or her probation;
(7) Whenever necessary, exercise the power of temporary custody as
provided in section 43-286.01;
(8) Establish procedures for the direction and guidance of deputy
juvenile probation officers under the district juvenile probation
officer's jurisdiction and advise such officers in regard to the most
effective performance of their duties;
(9) Supervise and evaluate deputy probation officers under the
district juvenile probation officer's jurisdiction;
(10) Delegate such duties and responsibilities to a deputy juvenile
probation officer as the district juvenile probation officer deems
appropriate;
(11) Make such reports as required by the administrator, the judges
of the juvenile probation district in which he or she serves, or the
Supreme Court;
(12) Keep accurate and complete accounts of all money or property
collected or received from juvenile probationers and give receipts
-9-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
therefor;
(13) Cooperate fully with and render all reasonable assistance to
other juvenile probation officers;
(14) In counties with a population of less than twenty-five thousand
people, participate in pretrial diversion programs established pursuant
to sections 29-3601 to 29-3604 and juvenile pretrial diversion programs
established pursuant to sections 43-260.02 to 43-260.07 as requested by
judges of the juvenile probation district in which he or she serves or as
requested by a county attorney and approved by such judges, except that
participation in such programs shall not require appointment of
additional personnel and shall be consistent with probation officers'
current caseloads;
(15) Participate, at the direction of the administrator pursuant to
an interlocal agreement which meets the requirements of section 9 of this
act, in non-probation-based programs and services;
(16) Perform such other duties not inconsistent with the Nebraska
Juvenile Probation Administration Act or the rules and regulations of the
agency as a court may from time to time direct; and
(17) Exercise all powers and perform all duties necessary and proper
to carry out the district juvenile probation officer's responsibilities.
Sec. 13. (1) The salaries and expenses incident to the conduct and
maintenance of the agency shall be paid by the state. Other expenses
shall be paid by the state as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
(2) The salaries and travel expenses of the juvenile probation
service shall be paid by the state. Travel expenses shall be paid as
provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
(3) The costs of drug testing and equipment incident to the
electronic surveillance of juvenile probationers shall be paid by the
state.
(4) The expenses incident to the conduct and maintenance of the
principal office within each juvenile probation district shall in the
-10-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
first instance be paid by the county in which it is located, but such
county shall be reimbursed for such expenses by all other counties within
the district to the extent and in the proportions determined by the
administrator based upon population, number of investigations, and
probation cases handled or upon such other basis as the administrator
deems fair and equitable.
(5) Each county shall provide office space and necessary facilities
for juvenile probation officers performing their official duties and
shall bear the costs incident to maintenance of such offices other than
salaries, travel expenses, and data processing and word processing
hardware and software that is provided on the state computer network.
(6) The cost of interpreter services for deaf and hard of hearing
persons and for persons unable to communicate the English language shall
be paid by the state with money appropriated to the Supreme Court for
that purpose or from other funds, including grant money, made available
to the Supreme Court for such purpose. Interpreter services shall include
auxiliary aids for deaf and hard of hearing persons as defined in section
20-151 and interpreters to assist persons unable to communicate the
English language as defined in section 25-2402. Interpreter services
shall be provided under this section for the purposes of conducting an
ongoing supervision by a juvenile probation officer of juvenile
probationers.
(7) The administrator shall prepare a budget and request for
appropriations for the agency and shall submit such request to the
appropriate authority in accordance with law.
Sec. 14. (1) The Juvenile Probation Contractual Services Cash Fund
is created. The fund shall consist only of payments received by the state
pursuant to contractual agreements with local political subdivisions for
probation services provided by the Juvenile Probation Agency. The fund
shall only be used to pay for probation services provided by the agency
to local political subdivisions which enter into contractual agreements
-11-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
with the agency. The fund shall be administered by the Juvenile Probation
Administrator. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The Juvenile Probation Program Cash Fund is created. The fund
shall consist of any other revenue received by the Juvenile Probation
Agency for credit to the fund from any other public or private source,
including, but not limited to, appropriations, grants, donations, gifts,
devises, bequests, fees, or reimbursements. Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 15. The agency shall establish performance metrics for
juvenile probation officers. Such metrics should measure efficacy in
providing rehabilitative and reentry services to juvenile probationers.
Such metrics should:
(1) Reflect a balanced approach that considers both compliance and
enforcement measures as well as outcomes related to rehabilitation,
reintegration, and public safety;
(2) Include indicators of progress for juvenile probationers, such
as successful completion of treatment programs, educational attainment,
employment status, and compliance with conditions of supervision;
(3) Emphasize the importance of providing supportive services,
fostering positive relationships with juvenile probationers, and
promoting successful rehabilitation; and
(4) Be aligned with best practices, stakeholder input, and the
evolving goals and priorities of the juvenile justice system.
Sec. 16. Section 29-2260.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
29-2260.01 It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that a
consistent and objective method of juvenile intake occur throughout the
-12-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
state for juveniles held in temporary custody by a law enforcement
officer, in accordance with section 43-250, to avoid either inappropriate
or unnecessary detention of juveniles which may result in inordinately
high detention rates, overcrowding of local detention facilities,
excessive detention costs for counties, and adverse consequences for the
juvenile, the juvenile's family, or the community. Juvenile intake
services shall be administered by probation officers acting as juvenile
intake probation intake officers and shall be available to all juvenile
courts in the state, both county courts sitting as juvenile courts and
separate juvenile courts. Such probation officers shall be appointed by
the probation administrator and designated within respective juvenile
probation districts based upon the need for such services as the
probation administrator determines. In order to adequately provide
juvenile intake services statewide and in accordance with the Juvenile
Detention and Probation Services Implementation Team Interim Report and
Recommendations filed with the Legislature December 15, 2000, it is the
intent of the Legislature to appropriate funds to the system to provide
seven additional probation officers to act in the capacity of juvenile
probation intake probation officers.
Sec. 17. Section 29-2260.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
29-2260.02 (1) The Department of Health and Human Services, as the
single state agency administering the Title IV-E state plan, has the
authority to enter into the agreement with the Juvenile Office of
Probation Agency Administration to act as a surrogate of the Department
of Health and Human Services to administer the Title IV-E state plan for
children it has placement and care authority of. The Department of Health
and Human Services as the public agency administering or supervising the
administration of the Title IV-E state plan in accordance with section
472(a)(2)(B)(ii) of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 672(a)(2)
(B)(ii), to obtain federal reimbursement for allowable maintenance,
-13-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
administrative, and training expenses in accordance with Title IV-E of
the federal Social Security Act, Public Law 96-272, Public Law 105-89,
and Public Law 110-351, maintains the ultimate responsibility to
supervise the agency's Office of Probation Administration's activities
regarding the Title IV-E requirements for eligible children served under
the agreement.
(2) The agency Office of Probation Administration has placement and
care responsibility for juveniles in out-of-home placement, also known as
foster care, described in subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of section
43-247. Placement and care constitutes accountability for the day-to-day
care and protection of juveniles. The responsibility of having placement
and care includes the development of an individual case plan for the
juvenile, including periodic review of the appropriateness and
suitability of the plan and the foster care placement, to ensure that
proper care and services are provided to facilitate return to the
juvenile's own home or to make an alternative placement. The case plan
activities include such items as assessing family strength and needs,
identifying and using community resources, and the periodic review and
determination of continued appropriateness of placement. Placement and
care does not include rights retained by the legal custodian, including,
but not limited to, provisions and decisions surrounding education,
morality, religion, discipline, and medical care.
Sec. 18. Section 29-2270, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-2270 Any individual who is less than nineteen years of age and
who is subject to the supervision of a juvenile probation officer or an
adult probation officer pursuant to an order of the district court,
county court, or juvenile court shall, as a condition of probation, be
required to:
(1) Attend school to obtain vocational training or to achieve an
appropriate educational level as prescribed by the probation officer
-14-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
after consultation with the school the individual attends or pursuant to
section 20 of this act 29-2272. If the individual fails to attend school
regularly, maintain appropriate school behavior, or make satisfactory
progress as determined by the probation officer after consultation with
the school and the individual does not meet the requirements of
subdivision (2) of this section, the district court, county court, or
juvenile court shall take appropriate action to enforce, modify, or
revoke its order granting probation; or
(2) Attend an on-the-job training program or secure and maintain
employment. If the individual fails to attend the program or maintain
employment and does not meet the requirements of subdivision (1) of this
section, the district court, county court, or juvenile court shall take
appropriate action to enforce, modify, or revoke its order granting
probation.
Sec. 19. Section 29-2271, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-2271 Section 18 of this act 29-2270 shall not apply to
individuals who pass the general education development test or who earn a
high school diploma. Subdivision (2) of section 18 of this act 29-2270
shall not apply to an individual required to attend school pursuant to
section 79-201.
Sec. 20. Section 29-2272, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-2272 (1) If the individual chooses to meet the requirements of
section 18 of this act 29-2270 by attending a public school and the
individual has previously been expelled from school, prior to the
readmission of the individual to the school, school officials shall meet
with the individual's probation officer and assist in developing
conditions of probation that will provide specific guidelines for
behavior and consequences for misbehavior at school as well as
educational objectives that must be achieved. The district court, county
-15-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
court, or juvenile court shall review the conditions of probation for the
individual and may continue the expulsion or return the individual to
school under the agreed conditions.
(2) The school board may expel the individual for subsequent actions
as provided in section 79-267.
(3) The individual shall be screened by the school to which he or
she is admitted for possible disabilities and, if the screening so
indicates, be referred for evaluation for possible placement in a special
education program.
Sec. 21. Section 29-2273, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-2273 The school district and the district court, county court, or
juvenile court may establish education, counseling, or other programs to
improve the behavior and educational performance of individuals covered
by section 18 of this act 29-2270.
Sec. 22. On and after July 1, 2026, positions of employment in the
Office of Probation Administration related to the powers, duties, and
functions transferred pursuant to this legislative bill are transferred
to the Juvenile Probation Agency. For purposes of the transition,
transferred employees of the office shall be considered employees of the
agency and shall retain any rights under the state personnel system or
pertinent bargaining agreement, and their service shall be deemed
continuous. This section does not grant transferred employees any new
rights or benefits not otherwise provided by law or bargaining agreement
or preclude the agency or the Juvenile Probation Administrator from
exercising any of the prerogatives of management set forth in section
81-1311 or as otherwise provided by law. This section is not an amendment
to or substitute for the provisions of any existing bargaining
agreements.
Sec. 23. On and after July 1, 2026, whenever the Office of
Probation Administration is referred to or designated by any contract or
-16-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
other document in connection with the duties and functions transferred to
the Juvenile Probation Agency pursuant to this legislative bill, such
reference or designation shall apply to the agency. All contracts entered
into by the division prior to July 1, 2026, in connection with the duties
and functions transferred to the agency are hereby recognized, with the
agency succeeding to all rights and obligations under such contracts. Any
cash funds, custodial funds, gifts, trusts, grants, and any
appropriations of funds from prior fiscal years available to satisfy
obligations incurred under such contracts shall be transferred and
appropriated to the agency for the payments of such obligations. All
documents and records transferred, or copies of the same, may be
authenticated or certified by the agency for all legal purposes.
Sec. 24. No suit, action, or other proceeding, judicial or
administrative, lawfully commenced prior to July 1, 2026, or which could
have been commenced prior to that date, by or against the Office of
Probation Administration or any employee of the office in such employee's
official capacity or in relation to the discharge of his or her official
duties, shall abate by reason of the transfer of duties and functions
from the division to the Juvenile Probation Agency.
Sec. 25. On and after July 1, 2026, unless otherwise specified,
whenever any provision of law refers to the Office of Probation
Administration in connection with duties and functions transferred to the
Juvenile Probation Agency by this legislative bill, such law shall be
construed as referring to the agency.
Sec. 26. All rules, regulations, and orders of the Office of
Probation Administration adopted prior to July 1, 2026, in connection
with the powers, duties, and functions transferred to the Juvenile
Probation Agency by this legislative bill shall continue to be effective
until revised, amended, repealed, or nullified pursuant to law.
Sec. 27. (1) On July 1, 2026, all items of property, real and
personal, including office furniture and fixtures, books, documents, and
-17-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
records of the Office of Probation Administration pertaining to the
duties and functions transferred to the Juvenile Probation Agency
pursuant to this legislative bill shall become the property of the
agency.
(2) Any appropriation and salary limit for fiscal year 2025-26
provided in any legislative bill enacted by the One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, First or Second Session, to Agency No. 5, Supreme Court, in
the following program classifications, shall be null and void, and any
such amounts are hereby appropriated to Agency No. XXX, Office of
Probation Administration: Program No. XXX, [Program Name]; and Program
No. XXX, [Program Name].
(3) Any financial obligations of the office that remain unpaid as of
June 30, 2026, and that are subsequently certified as valid encumbrances
to the accounting division of the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to sections 81-138.01 to 81-138.04, shall be paid by the
Juvenile Probation Agency from the unexpended balance of appropriations
existing in such program classifications on June 30, 2026.
Sec. 28. Section 25-2407, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
25-2407 Any person who serves as an interpreter for persons unable
to communicate the English language in court proceedings or probation
services as provided in subsection (6) of section 29-2259 or subsection
(6) of section 13 of this act shall meet the standards adopted by the
Supreme Court. Such standards shall require that interpreters demonstrate
the ability to interpret effectively, accurately, and impartially, both
receptively and expressively, using any necessary special vocabulary. A
person appointed to interpret for deaf and hard of hearing persons shall
be a licensed interpreter as defined in section 20-151 or, if a licensed
interpreter is unavailable, an interpreter licensed under the laws of
another state.
Sec. 29. Section 28-726, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-18-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
2024, is amended to read:
28-726 Except as provided in this section and sections 28-722 and
81-3126, no person, official, or agency shall have access to information
in the tracking system of child protection cases maintained pursuant to
section 28-715 or in records in the central registry of child protection
cases maintained pursuant to section 28-718 unless in furtherance of
purposes directly connected with the administration of the Child
Protection and Family Safety Act. Such persons, officials, and agencies
having access to such information shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) A law enforcement agency investigating a report of known or
suspected child abuse or neglect;
(2) A county attorney in preparation of a child abuse or neglect
petition or termination of parental rights petition;
(3) A physician who has before him or her a child whom he or she
reasonably suspects may be abused or neglected;
(4) An agency having the legal responsibility or authorization to
care for, treat, or supervise an abused or neglected child or a parent, a
guardian, or other person responsible for the abused or neglected child's
welfare who is the subject of the report of child abuse or neglect;
(5) Any person engaged in bona fide research or auditing. No
information identifying the subjects of the report of child abuse or
neglect shall be made available to the researcher or auditor;
(6) The Foster Care Review Office and the designated local foster
care review board when the information relates to a child in a foster
care placement as defined in section 43-1301. The information provided to
the office and local board shall not include the name or identity of any
person making a report of suspected child abuse or neglect;
(7) The designated protection and advocacy system authorized
pursuant to the Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights
Act of 2000, 42 U.S.C. 15001, as the act existed on January 1, 2005, and
the Protection and Advocacy for Mentally Ill Individuals Act, 42 U.S.C.
-19-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
10801, as the act existed on September 1, 2001, acting upon a complaint
received from or on behalf of a person with developmental disabilities or
mental illness;
(8) The person or persons having custody of the abused or neglected
child in situations of alleged out-of-home child abuse or neglect;
(9) The department, as required or authorized by state law, federal
law, federal regulation, or applicable federal program provisions and in
furtherance of its programs;
(10) A juvenile probation officer administering juvenile intake
services pursuant to section 16 of this act 29-2260.01, conducting court-
ordered predispositional investigations prior to disposition, or
supervising a juvenile upon disposition; and
(11) A child advocacy center pursuant to team protocols and in
connection with a specific case under review or investigation by a child
abuse and neglect investigation team or a child abuse and neglect
treatment team convened by a county attorney.
Sec. 30. Section 29-2246, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-2246 For purposes of the Nebraska Probation Administration Act
and sections 43-2,123.01 and 83-1,102 to 83-1,104, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Administrator means the probation administrator;
(2) (1) Association means the Nebraska District Court Judges
Association;
(3) Chief probation officer means the probation officer in charge of
a probation district;
(4) (2) Court means a district court or , county court , or juvenile
court as defined in section 43-245;
(5) Non-probation-based program or service means a program or
service established within the district, county, or juvenile courts and
provided to individuals not sentenced to, or placed on, probation who
-20-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
have been charged with or convicted of a crime, or against whom a
petition has been filed under the Nebraska Juvenile Code, for the purpose
of diverting the individual from incarceration or the juvenile justice
system or to provide treatment for issues related to the individual's
criminogenic needs. Non-probation-based programs or services include, but
are not limited to, problem solving courts established pursuant to
section 24-1302 and the treatment of problems relating to substance
abuse, mental health, sex offenses, or domestic violence;
(6) (3) Office means the Office of Probation Administration;
(7) Post-release supervision means the portion of a split sentence
following a period of incarceration under which a person found guilty of
a crime upon verdict or plea is released by a court subject to conditions
imposed by the court and subject to supervision by the office;
(8)(a) (4) Probation means: a
(b) A sentence under which a person found guilty of a crime upon
verdict or plea or adjudicated delinquent or in need of special
supervision is released by a court subject to conditions imposed by the
court and subject to supervision, including . Probation includes post-
release supervision; and
(c) Supervision supervision ordered by a court pursuant to a
deferred judgment under section 29-2292 or 29-4803;
(5) Probationer means a person sentenced to probation or post-
release supervision;
(9) (6) Probation officer means an employee of the system who
supervises probationers and conducts presentence , predisposition, or
other investigations as may be required by law or directed by a court in
which he or she is serving or performs such other duties as authorized
pursuant to section 29-2258, except unpaid volunteers from the community;
(10) Probationer means a person sentenced to, or placed on,
probation or post-release supervision; and
(7) Juvenile probation officer means any probation officer who
-21-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
supervises probationers of a separate juvenile court;
(8) Juvenile intake probation officer means an employee of the
system who is called upon by a law enforcement officer in accordance with
section 43-250 to make a decision regarding the furtherance of a
juvenile's detention;
(9) Chief probation officer means the probation officer in charge of
a probation district;
(11) (10) System means the Nebraska Probation System. ;
(11) Administrator means the probation administrator;
(12) Non-probation-based program or service means a program or
service established within the district, county, or juvenile courts and
provided to individuals not sentenced to probation who have been charged
with or convicted of a crime for the purpose of diverting the individual
from incarceration or to provide treatment for issues related to the
individual's criminogenic needs. Non-probation-based programs or services
include, but are not limited to, problem solving courts established
pursuant to section 24-1302 and the treatment of problems relating to
substance abuse, mental health, sex offenses, or domestic violence;
(13) Post-release supervision means the portion of a split sentence
following a period of incarceration under which a person found guilty of
a crime upon verdict or plea is released by a court subject to conditions
imposed by the court and subject to supervision by the office; and
(14) Rules and regulations means policies and procedures written by
the office and approved by the Supreme Court.
Sec. 31. Section 29-2248, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-2248 The association shall:
(1) Encourage development and implementation of uniform criteria for
sentencing criminals;
(2) Participate in planning and presenting institutes and seminars
for all judges in this state who sentence criminals or adjudicate
-22-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
juveniles to discuss related problems related to sentencing criminals or
juveniles;
(3) Participate in planning and presenting orientation programs for
new judges, such programs to include discussions of sentencing
alternatives, procedures, and purposes;
(4) Visit from time to time correctional facilities of this state;
(5) Encourage creation and development of community resources of
value to the probation system;
(6) Conduct such other programs of whatever nature of interest to
its members;
(7) Exercise all powers and perform all duties necessary and proper
to carry out its responsibilities; and
(8) Participate in planning and presenting institutes and seminars
for all county employees who work in the judicial branch of government.
Sec. 32. Section 29-2252.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
29-2252.01 On January 15 and July 15 of each fiscal year, the
administrator shall provide a report to the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services, the Legislative Fiscal Analyst,
and the Supreme Court which shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) The total number of felony cases supervised by the office in the
previous six months for both regular and intensive supervision probation;
(2) The total number of misdemeanor cases supervised by the office
in the previous six months for both regular and intensive supervision
probation;
(3) The felony caseload per officer for both regular and intensive
supervision probation on the last day of the reporting period;
(4) The misdemeanor caseload per officer for both regular and
intensive supervision probation on the last day of the reporting period;
(5) The total number of juvenile cases supervised by the office in
the previous six months for both regular and intensive supervision
-23-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
probation;
(5) (6) The total number of predisposition investigations completed
by the office in the previous six months;
(6) (7) The total number of presentence investigations completed by
the office in the previous six months; and
(8) The total number of juvenile intake screening interviews
conducted and detentions authorized by the office in the previous six
months, using the detention screening instrument described in section
43-260.01; and
(7) (9) The total number of probationers with restitution judgments,
the number of restitution payments made to clerks of the court, the
average amount of payments, and the total amount of restitution
collected.
The report submitted to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be
submitted electronically.
Sec. 33. Section 29-2253, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-2253 (1) The administrator, with the concurrence of the Supreme
Court, shall divide the state into probation districts and may from time
to time alter the boundaries of such districts in order to maintain the
most economical, efficient, and effective utilization of the system.
(2) The administrator shall appoint temporary and permanent
probation officers and employees for each probation district as may be
required to provide adequate probation services.
(3) The administrator shall appoint a chief probation officer with
the concurrence of the majority of all judges within a probation
district.
(4) The administrator shall, with the concurrence of all of the
separate juvenile court judges within each separate juvenile court, (a)
appoint for each separate juvenile court a chief juvenile probation
officer, any deputy juvenile probation officers required, and such other
-24-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
employees as may be required to provide adequate probation services for
such court and (b) set the salaries of such officers and employees. The
chief and deputy juvenile probation officers shall be selected with
reference to experience and understanding of problems of family life and
child welfare, juvenile delinquency, community organizations, and
training in the recognition and treatment of behavior disorders.
(4) (5) The administrator may direct a probation officer of one
probation district to temporarily act as probation officer for a court in
another probation district, and such probation officer while so serving
shall have all the powers and responsibilities as if he or she were
serving in the probation district to which he or she was originally
appointed.
(5) (6) The administrator, with the concurrence of the Supreme
Court, shall designate the location of the principal office of the system
within each probation district.
Sec. 34. Section 29-2257, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-2257 The Nebraska Probation System is established which shall
consist of the probation administrator, chief probation officers,
probation officers, and support staff. The system shall be responsible
for juvenile intake services, for preadjudication juvenile supervision
services under section 43-254, for presentence and other probation
investigations, for the direct supervision of persons placed on
probation, and for non-probation-based programs and services authorized
by an interlocal agreement pursuant to subdivision (16) of section
29-2252. The system shall be sufficient in size to assure that no
probation officer carries a caseload larger than is compatible with
adequate probation investigation or supervision. Probation officers shall
be compensated with salaries substantially equal to other state employees
who have similar responsibilities.
This provision for salary equalization shall apply only to probation
-25-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
officers and support staff and shall not apply to chief probation
officers, the probation administrator, the chief deputy administrator,
the deputy probation administrator, or any other similarly established
management positions.
Sec. 35. Section 29-2258, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-2258 A district probation officer shall:
(1) Conduct juvenile intake interviews and investigations in
accordance with sections 43-253 and 43-260.01 and supervise delivery of
preadjudication juvenile services under subdivision (1)(f) of section
43-254;
(1) (2) Make presentence and other investigations, as may be
required by law or directed by a court in which he or she is serving;
(2) (3) Supervise probationers in accordance with the rules and
regulations of the office and the directions of the sentencing court;
(3) (4) Advise the sentencing court, in accordance with the Nebraska
Probation Administration Act and such rules and regulations of the
office, of violations of the conditions of probation by individual
probationers;
(4) (5) Advise the sentencing court, in accordance with the rules
and regulations of the office and the direction of the court, when the
situation of a probationer may require a modification of the conditions
of probation or when a probationer's adjustment is such as to warrant
termination of probation;
(5) (6) Provide each probationer with a statement of the period and
conditions of his or her probation;
(6) (7) Whenever necessary, exercise the power of arrest as provided
in sections 29-2266.01 and 29-2266.02 or exercise the power of temporary
custody as provided in section 43-286.01;
(7) (8) Establish procedures for the direction and guidance of
deputy probation officers under his or her jurisdiction and advise such
-26-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
officers in regard to the most effective performance of their duties;
(8) (9) Supervise and evaluate deputy probation officers under his
or her jurisdiction;
(9) (10) Delegate such duties and responsibilities to a deputy
probation officer as he or she deems appropriate;
(10) (11) Make such reports as required by the administrator, the
judges of the probation district in which he or she serves, or the
Supreme Court;
(11) (12) Keep accurate and complete accounts of all money or
property collected or received from probationers and give receipts
therefor;
(12) (13) Cooperate fully with and render all reasonable assistance
to other probation officers;
(13) (14) In counties with a population of less than twenty-five
thousand people, participate in pretrial diversion programs established
pursuant to sections 29-3601 to 29-3604 and juvenile pretrial diversion
programs established pursuant to sections 43-260.02 to 43-260.07 as
requested by judges of the probation district in which he or she serves
or as requested by a county attorney and approved by the judges of the
probation district in which he or she serves, except that participation
in such programs shall not require appointment of additional personnel
and shall be consistent with the probation officer's current caseload;
(14) (15) Participate, at the direction of the probation
administrator pursuant to an interlocal agreement which meets the
requirements of section 29-2255, in non-probation-based programs and
services;
(15) (16) Perform such other duties not inconsistent with the
Nebraska Probation Administration Act or the rules and regulations of the
office as a court may from time to time direct; and
(16) (17) Exercise all powers and perform all duties necessary and
proper to carry out his or her responsibilities.
-27-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
Sec. 36. Section 29-2292, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-2292 (1) Upon a finding of guilt for which a judgment of
conviction may be rendered, a defendant may request the court defer the
entry of judgment of conviction. Upon such request and after giving the
prosecutor and defendant the opportunity to be heard, the court may defer
the entry of a judgment of conviction and the imposition of a sentence
and place the defendant on probation, upon conditions as the court may
require under section 29-2262.
(2) The court shall not defer judgment under this section if:
(a) The offense is a violation of section 42-924;
(b) The victim of the offense is an intimate partner as defined in
section 28-323;
(c) The offense is a violation of section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197 or a
city or village ordinance enacted in conformance with section 60-6,196 or
60-6,197; or
(d) The defendant is not eligible for probation.
(3) Whenever a court considers a request to defer judgment, the
court shall consider the factors set forth in section 29-2260 and any
other information the court deems relevant.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this section and sections
29-2293 and 29-2294, the supervision of a defendant on probation pursuant
to a deferred judgment shall be governed by the Nebraska Probation
Administration Act and sections 18 to 21 of this act 29-2270 to 29-2273.
(5) After a hearing providing the prosecutor and defendant an
opportunity to be heard and upon a finding that a defendant has violated
a condition of his or her probation, the court may enter any order
authorized by section 29-2268 or pronounce judgment and impose such new
sentence as might have been originally imposed for the offense for which
the defendant was convicted.
(6) Upon satisfactory completion of the conditions of probation and
-28-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
the payment or waiver of all administrative and programming fees assessed
under section 29-2293, the defendant or prosecutor may file a motion to
withdraw any plea entered by the defendant and to dismiss the action
without entry of judgment.
(7) The provisions of this section apply to offenses committed on or
after July 1, 2020. For purposes of this section, an offense shall be
deemed to have been committed prior to July 1, 2020, if any element of
the offense occurred prior to such date.
Sec. 37. Section 29-4803, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-4803 (1) The probation administrator shall create a veteran
justice program as provided in sections 29-4802 to 29-4804 and subject to
the Supreme Court's rules. The program shall be available in every
district court and county court. A veteran justice program shall not
supersede, alter, or otherwise interfere with the establishment,
functioning, participation, or operation of a problem solving court
established pursuant to section 24-1302.
(2) A veteran justice program shall be operated by use of deferred
judgments as provided in this section.
(3) Upon a finding of guilt for which a judgment of conviction may
be rendered, a defendant that is eligible to participate in a veteran
justice program may request the court defer the entry of judgment of
conviction under this section. Upon such request, the court shall provide
notice to any victim of the offense of the request and provide an
opportunity for the victim to provide a statement for consideration by
the court. After giving the prosecutor and defendant the opportunity to
be heard, the court may defer the entry of a judgment of conviction and
the imposition of a sentence and place the defendant on probation, upon
conditions as the court may require under sections 29-2262 and 29-4804.
If the court defers the entry of judgment, the court shall provide notice
to victims of the offense.
-29-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(4)(a) Whenever a court considers a request to defer judgment under
this section, the court shall consider the following:
(i) The factors set forth in subsections (2) and (3) of section
29-2260 and section 29-4802;
(ii) The supervision, treatment, and other programming options
available in the community; and
(iii) Any other information the court deems relevant.
(b) Except as provided in subdivision (4)(c) of this section, there
shall be a presumption that a veteran eligible under section 29-4802
shall be allowed to participate in a veteran justice program. The
presumption shall only be overcome by a judicial finding, based on an
individualized assessment of the veteran and consideration of the factors
set forth in subdivisions (4)(a)(i), (ii), and (iii) of this section,
that entry of judgment of conviction should not be deferred. The fact
that a veteran has previously absconded from or violated pretrial
release, probation, parole, supervised release, post-release supervision,
or another form of court-ordered supervision, including a violation
arising from commission of a new offense or an offense committed while
previously participating in a veteran justice program, is not, standing
alone, a sufficient basis to overcome the presumption.
(c) The presumption provided for in subdivision (4)(b) of this
section does not apply to a veteran charged with:
(i) A violation of section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197, or a city or
village ordinance enacted in conformance with section 60-6,196 or
60-6,197, following a previous conviction for a violation of any such
section or ordinance; or
(ii) An offense that resulted in serious bodily injury to another
person.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in this section and sections
29-2293 and 29-2294, the supervision of a defendant on probation pursuant
to a deferred judgment shall be governed by the Nebraska Probation
-30-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
Administration Act and sections 18 to 21 of this act 29-2270 to 29-2273.
(6) After a hearing providing the prosecutor and defendant an
opportunity to be heard and upon a finding that a defendant has violated
a condition of his or her probation, the court may enter any order
authorized by section 29-2268 or pronounce judgment and impose such new
sentence as might have been originally imposed for the offense for which
the defendant was convicted.
(7) Upon satisfactory completion of the conditions of probation and
the payment or waiver of all administrative and programming fees assessed
under section 29-2293, the defendant or prosecutor may file a motion to
withdraw any plea entered by the defendant and to dismiss the action
without entry of judgment. The court shall not grant such motion until a
victim of the offense has received notice and the opportunity to be
heard, as required by subsection (4) of section 29-4804.
(8) Sections 29-4802 to 29-4804 apply to offenses committed on or
after July 1, 2025. For purposes of this subsection, an offense shall be
deemed to have been committed prior to July 1, 2025, if any element of
the offense occurred prior to such date.
Sec. 38. Section 43-247.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-247.03 (1) In any juvenile case, the court may provide the
parties the opportunity to address issues involving the child's care and
placement, services to the family, and other concerns through restorative
justice practices. Restorative justice practices may include, but are not
limited to, prehearing conferences, family group conferences, expedited
family group conferences, child welfare mediation, permanency prehearing
conferences, termination of parental rights prehearing conferences,
juvenile victim-offender dialogue, victim youth conferencing, victim-
offender mediation, youth or community dialogue, panels, circles, and
truancy mediation. The Office of Dispute Resolution shall be responsible
for funding and management for such services provided by approved
-31-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
centers. All discussions taking place during such restorative justice
practices, including plea negotiations, shall be confidential and
privileged communications as provided in section 25-2914.01.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) Expedited family group conference means an expedited and
limited-scope facilitated planning meeting which engages a child's or
juvenile's parents, the child or juvenile when appropriate, other
critical family members, services providers, and staff members from
either the Department of Health and Human Services or the Juvenile
Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration to address immediate
placement issues for the child or juvenile;
(b) Family group conference means a facilitated meeting involving a
child's or juvenile's family, the child or juvenile when appropriate,
available extended family members from across the United States, other
significant and close persons to the family, service providers, and staff
members from either the Department of Health and Human Services or the
Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration to develop a
family-centered plan for the best interests of the child and to address
the essential issues of safety, permanency, and well-being of the child;
(c) Juvenile victim-offender dialogue means a court-connected
process in which a facilitator meets with the juvenile offender and the
victim in an effort to convene a dialogue in which the offender takes
responsibility for his or her actions and the victim is able to address
the offender and request an apology and restitution, with the goal of
creating an agreed-upon written plan;
(d) Prehearing conference means a facilitated meeting prior to
appearing in court and held to gain the cooperation of the parties, to
offer services and treatment, and to develop a problem-solving atmosphere
in the best interests of children involved in the juvenile court system.
A prehearing conference may be scheduled at any time during the child
welfare or juvenile court process, from initial removal through
-32-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
permanency, termination of parental rights, and juvenile delinquency
court processes; and
(e) Victim youth conferencing means a process in which a restorative
justice facilitator meets with the juvenile and the victim, when
appropriate, in an effort to convene a dialogue in which the juvenile
takes responsibility for his or her actions and the victim or victim
surrogate is able to address the juvenile and create a reparation plan
agreement, which may include apologies, restitution, community services,
or other agreed-upon means of amends.
Sec. 39. Section 43-250, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-250 (1) A peace officer who takes a juvenile into temporary
custody under section 29-401 or subdivision (1), (2), (3), or (7) of
section 43-248 shall immediately take reasonable measures to notify the
juvenile's parent, guardian, custodian, or relative and shall proceed as
follows:
(a) The peace officer may release a juvenile taken into temporary
custody under section 29-401 or subdivision (1), (2), or (7) of section
43-248;
(b) The peace officer may require a juvenile taken into temporary
custody under section 29-401 or subdivision (1) or (2) of section 43-248
to appear before the court of the county in which such juvenile was taken
into custody at a time and place specified in the written notice prepared
in triplicate by the peace officer or at the call of the court. The
notice shall also contain a concise statement of the reasons such
juvenile was taken into custody. The peace officer shall deliver one copy
of the notice to such juvenile and require such juvenile or his or her
parent, guardian, other custodian, or relative, or both, to sign a
written promise that such signer will appear at the time and place
designated in the notice. Upon the execution of the promise to appear,
the peace officer shall immediately release such juvenile. The peace
-33-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
officer shall, as soon as practicable, file one copy of the notice with
the county attorney or city attorney and, when required by the court,
also file a copy of the notice with the court or the officer appointed by
the court for such purpose; or
(c) The peace officer may retain temporary custody of a juvenile
taken into temporary custody under section 29-401 or subdivision (1),
(2), or (3) of section 43-248 and deliver the juvenile, if necessary, to
the probation officer and communicate all relevant available information
regarding such juvenile to the probation officer. The probation officer
shall determine the need for detention of the juvenile as provided in
section 43-260.01. Upon determining that the juvenile should be placed in
detention or an alternative to detention and securing placement in such
setting by the probation officer, the peace officer shall implement the
probation officer's decision to release or to detain and place the
juvenile. When secure detention of a juvenile is necessary, such
detention shall occur within a juvenile detention facility except:
(i) When a juvenile described in subdivision (1) or (2) of section
43-247, except for a status offender, is taken into temporary custody
within a metropolitan statistical area and where no juvenile detention
facility is reasonably available, the juvenile may be delivered, for
temporary custody not to exceed six hours, to a secure area of a jail or
other facility intended or used for the detention of adults solely for
the purposes of identifying the juvenile and ascertaining his or her
health and well-being and for safekeeping while awaiting transport to an
appropriate juvenile placement or release to a responsible party;
(ii) When a juvenile described in subdivision (1) or (2) of section
43-247, except for a status offender, is taken into temporary custody
outside of a metropolitan statistical area and where no juvenile
detention facility is reasonably available, the juvenile may be
delivered, for temporary custody not to exceed twenty-four hours
excluding nonjudicial days and while awaiting an initial court
-34-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
appearance, to a secure area of a jail or other facility intended or used
for the detention of adults solely for the purposes of identifying the
juvenile and ascertaining his or her health and well-being and for
safekeeping while awaiting transport to an appropriate juvenile placement
or release to a responsible party;
(iii) Whenever a juvenile is held in a secure area of any jail or
other facility intended or used for the detention of adults, there shall
be no verbal, visual, or physical contact between the juvenile and any
incarcerated adult and there shall be adequate staff to supervise and
monitor the juvenile's activities at all times. This subdivision shall
not apply to a juvenile charged with a felony as an adult in county or
district court if he or she is sixteen years of age or older;
(iv) If a juvenile is under sixteen years of age or is a juvenile as
described in subdivision (3) of section 43-247, he or she shall not be
placed within a secure area of a jail or other facility intended or used
for the detention of adults;
(v) If, within the time limits specified in subdivision (1)(c)(i) or
(1)(c)(ii) of this section, a felony charge is filed against the juvenile
as an adult in county or district court, he or she may be securely held
in a jail or other facility intended or used for the detention of adults
beyond the specified time limits;
(vi) A status offender or nonoffender taken into temporary custody
shall not be held in a secure area of a jail or other facility intended
or used for the detention of adults; and
(vii) A juvenile described in subdivision (1) or (2) of section
43-247, except for a status offender, may be held in a secure area of a
jail or other facility intended or used for the detention of adults for
up to six hours before and six hours after any court appearance.
(2)(a) (2) A juvenile taken into custody pursuant to a legal warrant
of arrest shall be delivered to a probation officer.
(b) For a felony arrest of a juvenile, the probation officer shall
-35-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
make a recommendation for detention, release without restrictions, or
release to an alternative to detention as provided in section 43-260.01.
The probation officer shall forward all intake information to a judge,
who shall consult with the probation officer, and then determine the need
for detention. In making such determination, the judge shall consider the
factors in subdivision (2) of section 43-260.01 but shall not be bound by
such factors.
(c) For an arrest of a juvenile not involving a felony, the
probation officer who shall determine the need for detention of the
juvenile as provided in section 43-260.01.
(d) If detention is not required, the juvenile may be released
without bond if:
(i) Such such release is in the best interests of the juvenile; ,
(ii) The the safety of the community is not at risk; , and
(iii) The the court that issued the warrant is notified that the
juvenile had been taken into custody and was released.
(3) In determining the appropriate temporary placement or
alternative to detention of a juvenile under this section, the peace
officer shall select the placement or alternative which is least
restrictive of the juvenile's freedom so long as such placement or
alternative is compatible with the best interests of the juvenile and the
safety of the community. Any alternative to detention shall cause the
least restriction of the juvenile's freedom of movement consistent with
the best interests of the juvenile and the safety of the community.
(4) When a juvenile is taken into temporary custody pursuant to
subdivision (4) of section 43-248, the peace officer shall deliver the
juvenile to the enrolled school of such juvenile.
(5) When a juvenile is taken into temporary custody pursuant to
subdivision (5), (6), or (7) of section 43-248, and not released under
subdivision (1)(a) of this section, the peace officer shall deliver the
custody of such juvenile to the Department of Health and Human Services
-36-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
which shall make a temporary placement of the juvenile in the least
restrictive environment consistent with the best interests of the
juvenile as determined by the department. The department shall supervise
such placement and, if necessary, consent to any necessary emergency
medical, psychological, or psychiatric treatment for such juvenile. The
department shall have no other authority with regard to such temporary
custody until or unless there is an order by the court placing the
juvenile in the custody of the department. If the peace officer delivers
temporary custody of the juvenile pursuant to this subsection, the peace
officer shall make a full written report to the county attorney within
twenty-four hours of taking such juvenile into temporary custody. If a
court order of temporary custody is not issued within forty-eight hours
of taking the juvenile into custody, the temporary custody by the
department shall terminate and the juvenile shall be returned to the
custody of his or her parent, guardian, custodian, or relative.
(6) If the peace officer takes the juvenile into temporary custody
pursuant to subdivision (8) of section 43-248, the peace officer may
place the juvenile at a mental health facility for evaluation and
emergency treatment or may deliver the juvenile to the Department of
Health and Human Services as provided in subsection (5) of this section.
At the time of the admission or turning the juvenile over to the
department, the peace officer responsible for taking the juvenile into
custody pursuant to subdivision (8) of section 43-248 shall execute a
written certificate as prescribed by the department which will indicate
that the peace officer believes the juvenile to be mentally ill and
dangerous, a summary of the subject's behavior supporting such
allegations, and that the harm described in section 71-908 is likely to
occur before proceedings before a juvenile court may be invoked to obtain
custody of the juvenile. A copy of the certificate shall be forwarded to
the county attorney. The peace officer shall notify the juvenile's
parents, guardian, custodian, or relative of the juvenile's placement.
-37-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
Sec. 40. Section 43-254, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-254 (1) Pending the adjudication of any case, and subject to
subdivision (5) of section 43-251.01, if it appears that the need for
placement or further detention exists, the juvenile may be:
(a) Placed or detained a reasonable period of time on order of the
court in the temporary custody of either the person having charge of the
juvenile or some other suitable person;
(b) Kept in some suitable place provided by the city or county
authorities;
(c) Placed in any proper and accredited charitable institution;
(d) Placed in a state institution, except any adult correctional
facility, when proper facilities are available and the only local
facility is a city or county jail, at the expense of the committing
county on a per diem basis as determined from time to time by the head of
the particular institution;
(e) Placed in the temporary care and custody of the Department of
Health and Human Services when it does not appear that there is any need
for secure detention, except that no juvenile alleged to be a juvenile
described in subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of section 43-247 shall
be placed in the care and custody or under the supervision of the
department; or
(f) Offered supervision options as determined pursuant to section
43-260.01, through the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation
Administration as ordered by the court and agreed to in writing by the
parties, if the juvenile is alleged to be a juvenile described in
subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of section 43-247 and it does not
appear that there is any need for secure detention.
(2) The court may assess the cost of such placement or detention in
whole or in part to the parent of the juvenile as provided in section
43-290.
-38-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(3) If a juvenile has been removed from his or her parent, guardian,
or custodian pursuant to subdivision (6) of section 43-248, the court may
enter an order continuing detention or placement upon a written
determination that continuation of the juvenile in his or her home would
be contrary to the health, safety, or welfare of such juvenile and that
reasonable efforts were made to preserve and reunify the family if
required under section 43-283.01.
Sec. 41. Section 43-258, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-258 (1) Pending the adjudication of any case under the Nebraska
Juvenile Code, the court may order the juvenile examined by a physician,
surgeon, psychiatrist, duly authorized community mental health service
program, or psychologist to aid the court in determining (a) a material
allegation in the petition relating to the juvenile's physical or mental
condition, (b) the juvenile's competence to participate in the
proceedings, (c) the juvenile's responsibility for his or her acts, or
(d) whether or not to provide emergency medical treatment.
(2)(a) Pending the adjudication of any case under the Nebraska
Juvenile Code and after a showing of probable cause that the juvenile is
within the court's jurisdiction, for the purposes of subsection (1) of
this section, the court may order such juvenile to be placed with the
Department of Health and Human Services for evaluation, except that no
juvenile alleged to be a juvenile as described in subdivision (1), (2),
(3)(b), or (4) of section 43-247 shall be placed with the department. If
a juvenile is placed with the department under this subdivision, the
department shall make arrangements for an appropriate evaluation. The
department shall determine whether the evaluation will be made on a
residential or nonresidential basis. Placement with the department for
the purposes of this section shall be for a period not to exceed thirty
days. If necessary to complete the evaluation, the court may order an
extension not to exceed an additional thirty days. Any temporary
-39-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
placement of a juvenile made under this section shall be in the least
restrictive environment consistent with the best interests of the
juvenile and the safety of the community.
(b) Pending the adjudication of any case in which a juvenile is
alleged to be a juvenile as described in subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or
(4) of section 43-247 and after a showing of probable cause that the
juvenile is within the court's jurisdiction, for the purposes of
subsection (1) of this section, the court may order an evaluation to be
arranged by the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation
Administration. Any temporary placement of a juvenile made under this
section shall be in the least restrictive environment consistent with the
best interests of the juvenile and the safety of the community.
(3) Upon completion of the evaluation, the juvenile shall be
returned to the court together with a written or electronic report of the
results of the evaluation. Such report shall include an assessment of the
basic needs of the juvenile and recommendations for continuous and long-
term care and shall be made to effectuate the purposes in subdivision (1)
of section 43-246. The juvenile shall appear before the court for a
hearing on the report of the evaluation results within ten days after the
court receives the evaluation.
(4) During any period of detention or evaluation prior to
adjudication, costs incurred on behalf of a juvenile shall be paid as
provided in section 43-290.01.
(5) The court shall provide copies of the evaluation report and any
evaluations of the juvenile to the juvenile's attorney and the county
attorney or city attorney prior to any hearing in which the report or
evaluation will be relied upon.
Sec. 42. Section 43-260, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-260 The Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation
Administration shall prepare and distribute to probation officers a
-40-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
standardized juvenile detention screening instrument. The types of risk
factors to be included as well as the format of this standardized
juvenile detention screening instrument shall be determined by the agency
office. The standardized juvenile detention screening instrument shall be
used as an assessment tool statewide by probation officers under section
43-260.01 in order to determine if detention of the juvenile is necessary
and, if so, whether detention or an alternative to detention is
indicated. Probation officers trained to administer the juvenile
detention screening instrument shall act as juvenile intake probation
officers. Only duly trained probation officers shall be authorized to
administer the juvenile detention screening instrument.
Sec. 43. Section 43-260.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-260.01 The need for preadjudication placement, services, or
supervision and the need for detention of a juvenile and whether
detention or an alternative to detention is indicated shall be:
(1) Subject subject to subdivision (5) of section 43-251.01; and
(2) Determined shall be determined as follows:
(a) (1) The standardized juvenile detention screening instrument
shall be used to evaluate the juvenile;
(b) (2) If the results indicate that detention is not required, the
juvenile shall be released without restriction or released to an
alternative to detention; and
(c) (3) If the results indicate that detention is required,
detention shall be pursued.
Sec. 44. Section 43-281, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-281 (1) Following an adjudication of jurisdiction and prior to
final disposition, the court may provide for evaluation of a juvenile as
provided in this section.
(2) If the adjudication of jurisdiction is not under subdivision
-41-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of section 43-247, the court may place the
juvenile with the Office of Juvenile Services or the Department of Health
and Human Services for evaluation. The office or department shall arrange
and pay for an appropriate evaluation if the office or department
determines that there are no parental funds or private or public
insurance available to pay for such evaluation.
(3)(a) If the adjudication of jurisdiction is under subdivision (1),
(2), (3)(b), or (4) of section 43-247, the court may order an evaluation
to be arranged by the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation
Administration.
(b) For a juvenile in detention, the court shall order that such
evaluation be completed and the juvenile returned to the court within
twenty-one days after the evaluation.
(c) For a juvenile who is not in detention, the evaluation shall be
completed and the juvenile returned to the court within thirty days.
(d) The physician, psychologist, licensed mental health
practitioner, professional counselor holding a privilege to practice in
Nebraska under the Licensed Professional Counselors Interstate Compact,
licensed drug and alcohol counselor, or other provider responsible for
completing the evaluation shall have up to ten days to complete the
evaluation after receiving the referral authorizing the evaluation.
(4) A juvenile pending evaluation ordered under this section shall
not reside in a detention facility at the time of the evaluation or while
waiting for the completed evaluation to be returned to the court unless
detention of such juvenile is a matter of immediate and urgent necessity
for the protection of such juvenile or the person or property of another
or if it appears that such juvenile is likely to flee the jurisdiction of
the court.
(5) The court shall provide copies of predisposition reports and
evaluations of the juvenile to the juvenile's attorney and the county
attorney or city attorney prior to any hearing in which the report or
-42-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
evaluation will be relied upon.
Sec. 45. Section 43-286, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-286 (1) When any juvenile is adjudicated to be a juvenile
described in subdivision (1), (2), or (4) of section 43-247:
(a) The court may continue the dispositional portion of the hearing,
from time to time upon such terms and conditions as the court may
prescribe, including an order of restitution of any property stolen or
damaged or an order requiring the juvenile to participate in restorative
justice programs or community service programs, if such order is in the
interest of the juvenile's reformation or rehabilitation, and, subject to
the further order of the court, may:
(i) Place the juvenile on probation subject to the supervision of a
probation officer; or
(ii) Permit the juvenile to remain in his or her own home or be
placed in a suitable family home or institution, subject to the
supervision of the probation officer;
(b) When it is alleged that the juvenile has exhausted all levels of
probation supervision and options for community-based services and
section 43-251.01 has been satisfied, a motion for commitment to a youth
rehabilitation and treatment center may be filed and proceedings held as
follows:
(i) The motion shall set forth specific factual allegations that
support the motion and a copy of such motion shall be served on all
persons required to be served by sections 43-262 to 43-267;
(ii) The Office of Juvenile Services shall be served with a copy of
such motion and shall be a party to the case for all matters related to
the juvenile's commitment to, placement with, or discharge from the
Office of Juvenile Services; and
(iii) The juvenile shall be entitled to a hearing before the court
to determine the validity of the allegations. At such hearing the burden
-43-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
is upon the state by a preponderance of the evidence to show that:
(A) All levels of probation supervision have been exhausted;
(B) All options for community-based services have been exhausted;
and
(C) Placement at a youth rehabilitation and treatment center is a
matter of immediate and urgent necessity for the protection of the
juvenile or the person or property of another or if it appears that such
juvenile is likely to flee the jurisdiction of the court;
(c) After the hearing, the court may, as a condition of an order of
intensive supervised probation, commit such juvenile to the Office of
Juvenile Services for placement at a youth rehabilitation and treatment
center operated in compliance with state law. Upon commitment by the
court to the Office of Juvenile Services, the court shall immediately
notify the Office of Juvenile Services of the commitment. Intensive
supervised probation for purposes of this subdivision means that the
Office of Juvenile Services shall be responsible for the care and custody
of the juvenile until the Office of Juvenile Services discharges the
juvenile from commitment to the Office of Juvenile Services. Upon
discharge of the juvenile, the court shall hold a review hearing on the
conditions of probation and enter any order allowed under subdivision (1)
(a) of this section;
(d) The Office of Juvenile Services shall notify those required to
be served by sections 43-262 to 43-267, all interested parties, and the
committing court of the pending discharge of a juvenile from the youth
rehabilitation and treatment center sixty days prior to discharge and
again in every case not less than thirty days prior to discharge. Upon
notice of pending discharge by the Office of Juvenile Services, the court
shall set a continued disposition hearing in anticipation of reentry. The
Office of Juvenile Services shall work in collaboration with the Juvenile
Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration in developing an
individualized reentry plan for the juvenile as provided in section
-44-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
43-425. The Office of Juvenile Services shall provide a copy of the
individualized reentry plan to the juvenile, the juvenile's attorney, and
the county attorney or city attorney prior to the continued disposition
hearing. At the continued disposition hearing, the court shall review and
approve or modify the individualized reentry plan, place the juvenile
under probation supervision, and enter any other order allowed by law. No
hearing is required if all interested parties stipulate to the
individualized reentry plan by signed motion. In such a case, the court
shall approve the conditions of probation, approve the individualized
reentry plan, and place the juvenile under probation supervision; and
(e) The Office of Juvenile Services is responsible for
transportation of the juvenile to and from the youth rehabilitation and
treatment center. The Office of Juvenile Services may contract for such
services. A plan for a juvenile's transport to return to the community
shall be a part of the individualized reentry plan. The Office of
Juvenile Services may approve family to provide such transport when
specified in the individualized reentry plan.
(2) When any juvenile is found by the court to be a juvenile
described in subdivision (3)(b) of section 43-247, the court may enter
such order as it is empowered to enter under subdivision (1)(a) of this
section.
(3) When any juvenile is adjudicated to be a juvenile described in
subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of section 43-247, the court may
order the juvenile to be assessed for referral to participate in a
restorative justice program. Factors that the judge may consider for such
referral include, but are not limited to: The juvenile's age,
intellectual capacity, and living environment; the ages of others who
were part of the offense; the age and capacity of the victim; and the
nature of the case.
(4) When a juvenile is placed on probation and a probation officer
has reasonable cause to believe that such juvenile has committed a
-45-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
violation of a condition of his or her probation, the probation officer
shall take appropriate measures as provided in section 43-286.01.
(5)(a) When a juvenile is placed on probation or under the
supervision of the court and it is alleged that the juvenile is again a
juvenile described in subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of section
43-247, a petition may be filed and the same procedure followed and
rights given at a hearing on the original petition. If an adjudication is
made that the allegations of the petition are true, the court may make
any disposition authorized by this section for such adjudications and the
county attorney may file a motion to revoke the juvenile's probation.
(b) When a juvenile is placed on probation or under the supervision
of the court for conduct under subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of
section 43-247 and it is alleged that the juvenile has violated a term of
probation or supervision or that the juvenile has violated an order of
the court, a motion to revoke probation or supervision or to change the
disposition may be filed and proceedings held as follows:
(i) The motion shall set forth specific factual allegations of the
alleged violations and a copy of such motion shall be served on all
persons required to be served by sections 43-262 to 43-267;
(ii) The juvenile shall be entitled to a hearing before the court to
determine the validity of the allegations. At such hearing the juvenile
shall be entitled to those rights relating to counsel provided by section
43-272 and those rights relating to detention provided by sections 43-254
to 43-256. The juvenile shall also be entitled to speak and present
documents, witnesses, or other evidence on his or her own behalf. He or
she may confront persons who have given adverse information concerning
the alleged violations, may cross-examine such persons, and may show that
he or she did not violate the conditions of his or her probation or
supervision or an order of the court or, if he or she did, that
mitigating circumstances suggest that the violation does not warrant
revocation of probation or supervision or a change of disposition. The
-46-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
hearing shall be held within a reasonable time after the juvenile is
taken into custody;
(iii) The hearing shall be conducted in an informal manner and shall
be flexible enough to consider evidence, including letters, affidavits,
and other material, that would not be admissible in an adversarial
criminal trial;
(iv) The juvenile shall not be confined, detained, or otherwise
significantly deprived of his or her liberty pursuant to the filing of a
motion described in this section unless the requirements of subdivision
(5) of section 43-251.01 and section 43-260.01 have been met. In all
cases when the requirements of subdivision (5) of section 43-251.01 and
section 43-260.01 have been met and the juvenile is confined, detained,
or otherwise significantly deprived of his or her liberty as a result of
his or her alleged violation of probation, supervision, or a court order,
the juvenile shall be given a preliminary hearing. If, as a result of
such preliminary hearing, probable cause is found to exist, the juvenile
shall be entitled to a hearing before the court in accordance with this
subsection;
(v) If the juvenile is found by the court to have violated the terms
of his or her probation or supervision or an order of the court, the
court may modify the terms and conditions of the probation, supervision,
or other court order, extend the period of probation, supervision, or
other court order, or enter any order of disposition that could have been
made at the time the original order was entered; and
(vi) In cases when the court revokes probation, supervision, or
other court order, it shall enter a written statement as to the evidence
relied on and the reasons for revocation.
(6)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (6)(b) of this section, the
court shall not change a disposition unless the court finds that the
juvenile has violated a term or condition of probation or supervision or
an order of the court and the procedures in subdivision (5)(b) of this
-47-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
section have been satisfied.
(b) Upon motion of the juvenile, the court may modify the terms or
conditions of probation or supervision or modify a dispositional order
if:
(i) All parties stipulate to the particular modification; and
(ii) The juvenile has consulted with counsel or has waived counsel.
Any waiver must be particular to the modification and shall comply with
section 43-3102.
(7) Costs incurred on behalf of a juvenile under this section shall
be paid as provided in section 43-290.01.
(8) When any juvenile is adjudicated to be a juvenile described in
subdivision (4) of section 43-247, the juvenile court shall within thirty
days of adjudication transmit to the Director of Motor Vehicles an
abstract of the court record of adjudication.
Sec. 46. Section 43-286.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-286.01 (1) For purposes of this section, graduated response means
an accountability-based series of sanctions, incentives, and services
designed to facilitate the juvenile’s continued progress in changing
behavior, ongoing compliance, and successful completion of probation.
Graduated response does not include restrictions of liberty that would
otherwise require a hearing under subsection (3) of section 43-253.
(2) The Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration
may establish a statewide standardized graduated response matrix of
incentives for compliance and positive behaviors and sanctions for
probationers who violate the terms and conditions of a court order. The
graduated response system shall use recognized best practices and be
developed with the input of stakeholders, including judges, probation
officers, county attorneys, defense attorneys, juveniles, and parents.
The agency office shall provide implementation and ongoing training to
all probation officers on the graduated response options.
-48-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(3) Graduated response sanctions should be immediate, certain,
consistent, and fair to appropriately address the behavior. Failure to
complete a sanction may result in repeating the sanction, increasing the
duration, or selecting a different sanction similar in nature. Continued
failure to comply could result in a request for a motion to revoke
probation. Once a sanction is successfully completed the alleged
probation violation is deemed resolved and cannot be alleged as a
violation in future proceedings.
(4) Graduated response incentives should provide positive
reinforcement to encourage and support positive behavior change and
compliance with court-ordered conditions of probation.
(5) Whenever a probation officer has reasonable cause to believe
that a juvenile subject to the supervision of a probation officer has
committed a violation of the terms of the juvenile's probation while on
probation, but that such juvenile will not attempt to leave the
jurisdiction and will not place lives or property in danger, the
probation officer shall either:
(a) Impose one or more graduated response sanctions with the
approval of his or her chief probation officer or such chief's designee.
The decision to impose graduated response sanctions in lieu of formal
revocation proceedings rests with the probation officer and his or her
chief probation officer or such chief's designee and shall be based upon
such juvenile's risk level, the severity of the violation, and the
juvenile's response to the violation. If graduated response sanctions are
to be imposed, such juvenile shall acknowledge in writing the nature of
the violation and agree upon the graduated response sanction with
approval of such juvenile's parents or guardian. Such juvenile has the
right to decline to acknowledge the violation, and if he or she declines
to acknowledge the violation, the probation officer shall submit a
written report pursuant to subdivision (5)(b) of this section. If the
juvenile fails to satisfy the graduated response sanctions and the
-49-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
officer office determines that a motion to revoke probation should be
pursued, the probation officer shall submit a written report pursuant to
subdivision (5)(b) of this section. A copy of the report shall be
submitted to the county attorney of the county where probation was
imposed; or
(b) Submit a written report to the county attorney of the county
where probation was imposed and to the juvenile’s attorney of record,
outlining the nature of the probation violation and request that formal
revocation proceedings be instituted against the juvenile subject to the
supervision of a probation officer. The report shall also include a
statement regarding why graduated response sanctions were not utilized or
were ineffective. If there is no attorney of record for the juvenile, the
officer office shall notify the court and counsel for the juvenile shall
be appointed.
(6) Whenever a probation officer has reasonable cause to believe
that a juvenile subject to the supervision of a probation officer has
violated a condition of his or her probation and that such juvenile will
attempt to leave the jurisdiction or will place lives or property in
danger, the probation officer shall take such juvenile into temporary
custody without a warrant and may call on any peace officer for
assistance as provided in section 43-248. Continued detention or
deprivation of liberty shall be subject to the criteria and requirements
of sections 43-251.01, 43-260, and 43-260.01 and subdivision (5)(b)(iv)
of section 43-286, and a hearing shall be held before the court within
twenty-four hours as provided in subsection (3) of section 43-253.
(7) Immediately after detention or deprivation of liberty pursuant
to subsection (6) of this section, the probation officer shall notify the
county attorney of the county where probation was imposed and the
juvenile's attorney of record and submit a written report describing the
risk of harm to lives or property or of fleeing the jurisdiction which
precipitated the need for such detention or deprivation of liberty and of
-50-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
any violation of probation. If there is no attorney of record for the
juvenile, the officer office shall notify the court and counsel for the
juvenile shall be appointed. After prompt consideration of the written
report, the county attorney shall:
(a) Order the release of the juvenile from confinement or
alternative to detention subject to the supervision of a probation
officer; or
(b) File with the adjudicating court a motion to revoke the
probation.
(8) Whenever a county attorney receives a report from a probation
officer that a juvenile subject to the supervision of a probation officer
has violated a condition of probation and the probation officer is
seeking revocation of probation, the county attorney may file a motion to
revoke probation.
(9) Whenever a juvenile subject to supervision of a probation
officer is engaging in positive behavior, completion of goals, and
compliance with the terms of probation, the probation officer shall use
graduated incentives to provide positive reinforcement and encouragement
of such behavior. The Juvenile Probation Agency office shall keep records
of all incentives and provide such records to the county attorney or the
juvenile’s attorney upon request.
(10) During the term of probation, the court, on application of a
probation officer or of the juvenile or on its own motion, may reduce or
eliminate any of the conditions imposed on the juvenile. Upon completion
of the term of probation or the earlier discharge of the juvenile, the
juvenile shall be relieved of any obligations imposed by the order of the
court and his or her record shall be sealed pursuant to section
43-2,108.04.
(11) The Juvenile Probation Administrator probation administrator
shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this
section.
-51-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
Sec. 47. Section 43-290.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-290.01 (1) Payment of costs for juveniles described in or alleged
to be described in subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of section
43-247, except as ordered by the court pursuant to section 43-290, shall
be paid by:
(a) The county for the period of time prior to adjudication, except
as provided in subdivision (1)(b) of this section. Such costs paid for by
the county include, but are not limited to, the costs of detention,
services, detention alternatives, treatment, voluntary services, and
transportation;
(b) The Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration
for:
(i) The period of time after adjudication until termination of court
jurisdiction, including, but not limited to, the costs of evaluations,
detention, services, placement that is not detention, detention
alternatives, treatment, voluntary services, and transportation, other
than transportation paid under subdivision (1)(c) of this section;
(ii) The time period prior to adjudication for a juvenile who is on
probation and is alleged to have committed a new violation or is a
juvenile who is subject to a motion to revoke probation; and
(iii) Preadjudication evaluations and preadjudication placements
that are not detention; and
(c) The Office of Juvenile Services for any period of time from when
the court commits the juvenile to the Office of Juvenile Services until
the juvenile is discharged by the Office of Juvenile Services, including,
but not limited to, the costs of evaluations, placement, services,
detention including detention costs prior to placement, and
transportation to and from the youth rehabilitation and treatment center.
(2) For payment of costs involved in the adjudication and
disposition of juveniles, other than those described in subsection (1) or
-52-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(3) of this section:
(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall pay the costs
incurred during an evaluation or placement with the department that is
ordered by the court except as otherwise ordered by the court pursuant to
section 43-290;
(b) Payment of costs for juveniles with a court adjudication or
disposition under section 43-284: Upon a determination by the court that
there are no parental, private, or other funds available for the care,
custody, education, and maintenance of the juvenile, the court may order
a reasonable sum for the care, custody, education, and maintenance of the
juvenile to be paid out of a fund appropriated annually by the county
where the petition is filed until suitable provisions are made for the
juvenile without such payment. The amount to be paid by a county for
education shall not exceed the average cost for education of a public
school student in the county in which the juvenile is placed and shall be
paid only for education in kindergarten through grade twelve; and
(c) Other costs shall be as provided in section 43-290.
(3) Payment of costs of medical expenses of juveniles under the
Nebraska Juvenile Code shall be as provided in section 43-290.
Sec. 48. Section 43-297.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-297.01 (1) Following an adjudication, whenever any juvenile is
placed on juvenile probation subject to the supervision of a probation
officer, the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration
is deemed to have placement and care responsibility for the juvenile.
(2) The court shall order the initial placement and level of care
for the juvenile placed on juvenile probation. Prior to determining the
placement and level of care for a juvenile, the court may solicit a
recommendation from the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation
Administration. The status of each juvenile placed out-of-home shall be
reviewed periodically, but not less than once every six months by the
-53-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
court in person, by video, or telephonically. Periodic reviews shall
assess the juvenile's safety and the continued necessity and
appropriateness of placement, ensure case plan compliance, and monitor
the juvenile's progress. The court shall determine whether an out-of-home
placement made by the agency office is in the best interests of the
juvenile. The agency office shall provide all interested parties with a
copy of any report filed with the court by the agency office pursuant to
this subsection.
(3) The Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration
may transition a juvenile to a less restrictive placement or to a
placement which has the same level of restriction as the current
placement. In order to make a placement change under this section, the
agency office shall file a notice of placement change with the court and
shall send copies of the notice to all interested parties at least seven
days before the change of placement. The court, on its own motion, or
upon the filing of an objection to the change by an interested party, may
order a hearing to review such a change in placement and may order that
the change be stayed pending the outcome of the hearing on the objection.
(4) The Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration
may make an immediate change in placement without court approval only if
the juvenile is in a harmful or dangerous situation. Approval of the
court shall be sought within twenty-four hours after making the change in
placement or as soon thereafter as possible. The agency office shall
provide all interested parties with a copy of any report filed with the
court by the agency office pursuant to this subsection.
(5) Whenever the court places a juvenile in a foster care placement
as defined in section 43-1301, the Foster Care Review Office or
designated local foster care review board may participate in proceedings
concerning the juvenile as provided in section 43-1313 and notice shall
be given as provided in section 43-1314.
(6) Any written findings or recommendations of the Foster Care
-54-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
Review Office or the designated local foster care review board with
regard to a juvenile in a foster care placement submitted to a court
having jurisdiction over such juvenile shall be admissible in any
proceeding concerning such juvenile if such findings or recommendations
have been provided to all other parties of record.
(7) Nothing in this section prevents the court on an ex parte basis
from approving an immediate change in placement upon good cause shown.
Sec. 49. Section 43-2,108, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-2,108 (1) The juvenile court judge shall keep a record of all
proceedings of the court in each case, including appearances, findings,
orders, decrees, and judgments, and any evidence which he or she feels it
is necessary and proper to record. The case file shall contain the
complaint or petition and subsequent pleadings. The case file may be
maintained as an electronic document through the court's electronic case
management system, on microfilm, or in a paper volume and disposed of
when determined by the State Records Administrator pursuant to the
Records Management Act.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section,
the medical, psychological, psychiatric, and social welfare reports and
the records of juvenile probation officers, as they relate to individual
proceedings in the juvenile court, shall not be open to inspection,
without order of the court. Such records shall be made available to a
district court of this state or the District Court of the United States
on the order of a judge thereof for the confidential use of such judge or
his or her probation officer as to matters pending before such court but
shall not be made available to parties or their counsel; and such
district court records shall be made available to a county court or
separate juvenile court upon request of the county judge or separate
juvenile judge for the confidential use of such judge and his or her
probation officer as to matters pending before such court, but shall not
-55-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
be made available by such judge to the parties or their counsel.
(3) As used in this section, confidential record information means
all docket records, other than the pleadings, orders, decrees, and
judgments; case files and records; reports and records of probation
officers; and information supplied to the court of jurisdiction in such
cases by any individual or any public or private institution, agency,
facility, or clinic, which is compiled by, produced by, and in the
possession of any court. In all cases under subdivision (3)(a) of section
43-247, access to all confidential record information in such cases shall
be granted only as follows: (a) The court of jurisdiction may, subject to
applicable federal and state regulations, disseminate such confidential
record information to any individual, or public or private agency,
institution, facility, or clinic which is providing services directly to
the juvenile and such juvenile's parents or guardian and his or her
immediate family who are the subject of such record information; (b) the
court of jurisdiction may disseminate such confidential record
information, with the consent of persons who are subjects of such
information, or by order of such court after showing of good cause, to
any law enforcement agency upon such agency's specific request for such
agency's exclusive use in the investigation of any protective service
case or investigation of allegations under subdivision (3)(a) of section
43-247, regarding the juvenile or such juvenile's immediate family, who
are the subject of such investigation; and (c) the court of jurisdiction
may disseminate such confidential record information to any court, which
has jurisdiction of the juvenile who is the subject of such information
upon such court's request.
(4) The court shall provide copies of predispositional reports and
evaluations of the juvenile to the juvenile's attorney and the county
attorney or city attorney prior to any hearing in which the report or
evaluation will be relied upon.
(5) In all cases under sections 43-246.01 and 43-247, the office of
-56-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare may submit a written request
to the Juvenile Probation Administrator probation administrator for
access to the records of juvenile probation officers in a specific case.
Upon a juvenile court order, the records shall be provided to the
Inspector General within five days for the exclusive use in an
investigation pursuant to the Office of Inspector General of Nebraska
Child Welfare Act. Nothing in this subsection shall prevent the
notification of death or serious injury of a juvenile to the Inspector
General of Nebraska Child Welfare pursuant to section 43-4318 as soon as
reasonably possible after the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of
Probation Administration learns of such death or serious injury.
(6) In all cases under sections 43-246.01 and 43-247, the juvenile
court shall disseminate confidential record information to the Foster
Care Review Office pursuant to the Foster Care Review Act.
(7) Nothing in subsections (3), (5), and (6) of this section shall
be construed to restrict the dissemination of confidential record
information between any individual or public or private agency,
institute, facility, or clinic, except any such confidential record
information disseminated by the court of jurisdiction pursuant to this
section shall be for the exclusive and private use of those to whom it
was released and shall not be disseminated further without order of such
court.
(8)(a) Any records concerning a juvenile court petition filed
pursuant to subdivision (3)(c) of section 43-247 shall remain
confidential except as may be provided otherwise by law. Such records
shall be accessible to (i) the juvenile except as provided in subdivision
(b) of this subsection, (ii) the juvenile's counsel, (iii) the juvenile's
parent or guardian, and (iv) persons authorized by an order of a judge or
court.
(b) Upon application by the county attorney or by the director of
the facility where the juvenile is placed and upon a showing of good
-57-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
cause therefor, a judge of the juvenile court having jurisdiction over
the juvenile or of the county where the facility is located may order
that the records shall not be made available to the juvenile if, in the
judgment of the court, the availability of such records to the juvenile
will adversely affect the juvenile's mental state and the treatment
thereof.
(9) Nothing in subsection (3), (5), or (6) of this section shall be
construed to restrict the immediate dissemination of a current picture
and information about a child who is missing from a foster care or out-
of-home placement. Such dissemination by the Juvenile Probation Agency
Office of Probation Administration shall be authorized by an order of a
judge or court. Such information shall be subject to state and federal
confidentiality laws and shall not include that the child is in the care,
custody, or control of the Department of Health and Human Services or
under the supervision of the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of
Probation Administration.
(10) Any juvenile court order that places a juvenile on electronic
monitoring shall also state whether the data from such electronic
monitoring device shall be made available to a law enforcement agency
immediately upon request by such agency. For any juvenile subject to the
supervision of a probation officer, the name of the juvenile, the name of
the juvenile's probation officer, and any terms of probation included in
a juvenile court order otherwise open to inspection shall be provided to
the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice which
shall provide access to such information to law enforcement agencies
through the state's criminal justice information system.
Sec. 50. Section 43-2,108.05, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
43-2,108.05 (1) If the court orders the record of a juvenile sealed,
the court shall:
(a) Order that all records, including any information or other data
-58-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
concerning any proceedings relating to the offense, including the arrest,
taking into custody, petition, complaint, indictment, information, trial,
hearing, adjudication, correctional supervision, dismissal, or other
disposition or sentence, be deemed never to have occurred;
(b) Send notice of the order to seal the record (i) if the record
includes impoundment or prohibition to obtain a license or permit
pursuant to section 43-287, to the Department of Motor Vehicles, (ii) if
the juvenile whose record has been ordered sealed was a ward of the state
at the time the proceeding was initiated or if the Department of Health
and Human Services was a party in the proceeding, to such department, and
(iii) to law enforcement agencies, county attorneys, and city attorneys
referenced in the court record;
(c) Order all notified under subdivision (1)(b) of this section to
seal all records pertaining to the offense;
(d) If the case was transferred from district court to juvenile
court or was transferred under section 43-282, send notice of the order
to seal the record to the transferring court; and
(e) Explain to the juvenile using developmentally appropriate
language what sealing the record means. The explanation shall be given
verbally if the juvenile is present in the court at the time the court
issues the sealing order and by written notice sent by regular mail to
the juvenile's last-known address if the juvenile is not present in the
court at the time the court issues the sealing order. The sealing order
shall include contact information for each government agency subject to
the sealing order.
(2) The effect of having a record sealed is that thereafter no
person is allowed to release any information concerning such record,
except as provided by this section. After a record is sealed, the person
whose record was sealed can respond to any public inquiry as if the
offense resulting in such record never occurred. A government agency and
any other public office or agency shall reply to any public inquiry that
-59-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
no information exists regarding a sealed record. Except as provided in
subsection (3) of this section, an order to seal the record applies to
every government agency and any other public office or agency that has a
record relating to the offense, regardless of whether it receives notice
of the hearing on the sealing of the record or a copy of the order. Upon
the written request of a person whose record has been sealed and the
presentation of a copy of such order, a government agency or any other
public office or agency shall seal all records pertaining to the offense.
(3) A sealed record is accessible to the individual who is the
subject of the sealed record and any persons authorized by such
individual, law enforcement officers, county attorneys, and city
attorneys in the investigation, prosecution, and sentencing of crimes, to
the sentencing judge in the sentencing of criminal defendants, to a judge
making a determination whether to transfer a case to or from juvenile
court, to any attorney representing the subject of the sealed record, and
to the Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare pursuant to an
investigation conducted under the Office of Inspector General of Nebraska
Child Welfare Act. Inspection of records that have been ordered sealed
under section 43-2,108.04 may be made by the following persons or for the
following purposes:
(a) By the court or by any person allowed to inspect such records by
an order of the court for good cause shown;
(b) By the court, city attorney, or county attorney for purposes of
collection of any remaining parental support or obligation balances under
section 43-290;
(c) By the Nebraska Juvenile Probation System for purposes of
juvenile intake services and other juvenile probation investigations and
for the direct supervision of persons placed on juvenile probation; ,
(d) By the Nebraska Probation System for presentence and other
probation investigations , and for the direct supervision of persons
placed on probation; and
-60-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(e) By by the Department of Correctional Services, the Office of
Juvenile Services, a juvenile assessment center, a criminal detention
facility, a juvenile detention facility, or a staff secure juvenile
facility, for an individual committed to it, placed with it, or under its
care;
(f) (d) By the Department of Health and Human Services for purposes
of juvenile intake services, the preparation of case plans and reports,
the preparation of evaluations, compliance with federal reporting
requirements, or the supervision and protection of persons placed with
the department or for licensing or certification purposes under sections
71-1901 to 71-1906.01, the Child Care Licensing Act, or the Children's
Residential Facilities and Placing Licensure Act;
(g) (e) By the individual who is the subject of the sealed record
and by persons authorized by such individual. The individual shall
provide satisfactory verification of his or her identity;
(h) (f) At the request of a party in a civil action that is based on
a case that has a sealed record, as needed for the civil action. The
party also may copy the sealed record as needed for the civil action. The
sealed record shall be used solely in the civil action and is otherwise
confidential and subject to this section;
(i) (g) By persons engaged in bona fide research, with the
permission of the court or the State Court Administrator, only if the
research results in no disclosure of the person's identity and protects
the confidentiality of the sealed record; or
(j) (h) By a law enforcement agency if the individual whose record
has been sealed applies for employment with the law enforcement agency.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits the Department of Health and
Human Services from releasing information from sealed records in the
performance of its duties with respect to the supervision and protection
of persons served by the department.
(5) In any application for employment, bonding, license, education,
-61-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
or other right or privilege, any appearance as a witness, or any other
public inquiry, a person cannot be questioned with respect to any offense
for which the record is sealed. If an inquiry is made in violation of
this subsection, the person may respond as if the offense never occurred.
Applications for employment shall contain specific language that states
that the applicant is not obligated to disclose a sealed record.
Employers shall not ask if an applicant has had a record sealed. The
Department of Labor shall develop a link on the department's website to
inform employers that employers cannot ask if an applicant had a record
sealed and that an application for employment shall contain specific
language that states that the applicant is not obligated to disclose a
sealed record.
(6) Any person who knowingly violates this section shall be guilty
of a Class V misdemeanor.
Sec. 51. Section 43-2,113, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-2,113 (1) In counties where a separate juvenile court is
established, the county board of the county shall provide suitable rooms
and offices for the accommodation of the judge of the separate juvenile
court and the officers and employees appointed by such judge or by the
Juvenile Probation Administrator probation administrator pursuant to
subsection (4) of section 8 of this act 29-2253. Such separate juvenile
court and the judge, officers, and employees of such court shall have the
same and exclusive jurisdiction, powers, and duties that are prescribed
in the Nebraska Juvenile Code, concurrent jurisdiction under section
83-223, and such other jurisdiction, powers, and duties as specifically
provided by law.
(2) A juvenile court created in a separate juvenile court judicial
district or a county court sitting as a juvenile court in all other
counties shall have and exercise jurisdiction within such juvenile court
judicial district or county court judicial district with the county court
-62-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
and district court in all matters arising under Chapter 42, article 3,
when the care, support, custody, or control of minor children under the
age of eighteen years is involved. Such cases shall be filed in the
county court and district court and may, with the consent of the juvenile
judge, be transferred to the trial docket of the separate juvenile court
or county court.
(3) All orders issued by a separate juvenile court or a county court
which provide for child support or spousal support as defined in section
42-347 shall be governed by sections 42-347 to 42-381 and 43-290 relating
to such support. Certified copies of such orders shall be filed by the
clerk of the separate juvenile or county court with the clerk of the
district court who shall maintain a record as provided in subsection (4)
of section 42-364. There shall be no fee charged for the filing of such
certified copies.
Sec. 52. Section 43-412, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-412 (1) Every juvenile committed to the Office of Juvenile
Services pursuant to the Nebraska Juvenile Code shall remain committed
until he or she attains the age of nineteen or is legally discharged.
(2) Upon attainment of the age of nineteen or absent a continuing
order of intensive supervised probation, discharge of any juvenile
pursuant to the rules and regulations shall be a complete release from
all penalties incurred by conviction or adjudication of the offense for
which he or she was committed.
(3) The Office of Juvenile Services shall provide the committing
court, Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration,
county attorney, defense attorney, if any, and guardian ad litem, if any,
with written notification of the juvenile's discharge within thirty days
prior to a juvenile being discharged from the care and custody of the
office.
Sec. 53. Section 43-425, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-63-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
2024, is amended to read:
43-425 (1) The Community and Family Reentry Process is hereby
created. This process is created in order to reduce recidivism and
promote safe and effective reentry for the juvenile and his or her family
to the community from the juvenile justice system.
(2) While a juvenile is committed to a youth rehabilitation and
treatment center, family team meetings shall be conducted in person or
via videoconferencing at least once per month with the juvenile's support
system to discuss the juvenile's transition back to the community. A
juvenile's support system should be made up of any of the following: The
juvenile himself or herself, any immediate family members or guardians,
informal and formal supports, the juvenile's guardian ad litem appointed
by the court, the juvenile's probation officer, Office of Juvenile
Services personnel employed by the facility, and any additional personnel
as appropriate. Once developed, individualized reentry plans should be
discussed at the family team meetings with the juvenile and other members
of the juvenile's support system and shall include discussions on the
juvenile's placement after leaving the facility. The probation officer
and the Office of Juvenile Services personnel should discuss progress and
needs of the juvenile and should help the juvenile follow his or her
individual reentry plan to help with his or her transition back to the
community.
(3) Within sixty days prior to discharge from a youth rehabilitation
and treatment center, or as soon as possible if the juvenile's remaining
time at the youth rehabilitation and treatment center is less than sixty
days, an evidence-based risk screening and needs assessment should be
conducted on the juvenile in order to determine the juvenile's risk of
reoffending and the juvenile's individual needs upon reentering the
community.
(4) Individualized reentry plans shall be developed with input from
the juvenile and his or her support system in conjunction with a risk
-64-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
assessment process. Individualized reentry plans shall be finalized
thirty days prior to the juvenile leaving the youth rehabilitation and
treatment center or as soon as possible if the juvenile's remaining time
at the center is less than thirty days. Individualized reentry plans
should include specifics about the juvenile's placement upon return to
the community, an education transition plan, a treatment plan with any
necessary appointments being set prior to the juvenile leaving the
center, and any other formal and informal supports for the juvenile and
his or her family. The district juvenile probation officer and Office of
Juvenile Services personnel shall review the individualized reentry plan
and the expected outcomes as a result of the plan with the juvenile and
his or her support system within thirty days prior to the juvenile's
discharge from the center.
(5) The probation officer shall have contact with the juvenile and
the juvenile's support system within forty-eight hours after the juvenile
returns to the community and continue to assist the juvenile and the
juvenile's support system in implementing and following the
individualized reentry plan and monitoring the juvenile's risk through
ongoing assessment updates.
(6) The Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration
shall:
(a) Establish an evidence-based reentry process that utilizes risk
assessment to determine the juvenile's supervision level upon return to
the community;
(b) Establish supervision strategies based on risk levels of the
juvenile and supervise accordingly, with ongoing reassessment to assist
in determining eligibility for release from probation;
(c) Develop a formal matrix of graduated sanctions to be utilized
prior to requesting the county attorney to file for probation revocation;
and
(d) Provide training to its workers on risk-based supervision
-65-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
strategies, motivational interviewing, family engagement, community-based
resources, and other evidence-based reentry strategies.
Sec. 54. Section 43-1302, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-1302 (1) The Foster Care Review Office is hereby established. The
purpose of the office is to provide information and direct reporting to
the courts, the Department of Health and Human Services, the Juvenile
Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration, and the Legislature
regarding the foster care system in Nebraska; to provide oversight of the
foster care system; and to make recommendations regarding foster care
policy to the Legislature. The executive director of the Foster Care
Review Office shall provide information and reporting services, provide
analysis of information obtained, and oversee foster care file audit case
reviews and tracking of cases of children in the foster care system. The
executive director of the office shall, through information analysis and
with the assistance of the Foster Care Advisory Committee, (a) determine
key issues of the foster care system and ways to resolve the issues and
to otherwise improve the system and (b) make policy recommendations.
(2)(a) The Foster Care Advisory Committee is created. The committee
shall have five members appointed by the Governor. Three members shall be
local board members, one member shall have data analysis experience, and
one member shall be a resident of the state who is representative of the
public at large. The members shall have no pecuniary interest in the
foster care system and shall not be employed by the office, the
Department of Health and Human Services, a county, a residential child-
caring agency, a child-placing agency, or a court.
(b) The Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature shall
hold a confirmation hearing for the appointees, and the appointments
shall be subject to confirmation by the Legislature, except that the
members appointed while the Legislature is not in session shall serve
until the next session of the Legislature, at which time a majority of
-66-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
the members of the Legislature shall approve or disapprove of the
appointments.
(c) The terms of the members shall be for three years, except that
the Governor shall designate two of the initial appointees to serve
initial terms ending on March 1, 2014, and three of the initial
appointees to serve initial terms ending on March 1, 2015. The Governor
shall make the initial appointments within thirty days after July 1,
2012. Members shall not serve more than two consecutive terms, except
that members shall serve until their successors have been appointed and
qualified. The Governor shall appoint members to fill vacancies from the
same category as the vacated position to serve for the remainder of the
unexpired term.
(d) The Foster Care Advisory Committee shall meet at least four
times each calendar year. Each member shall attend at least two meetings
each calendar year and shall be subject to removal for failure to attend
at least two meetings unless excused by a majority of the members of the
committee. Members shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in
sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
(e) The duties of the Foster Care Advisory Committee are to:
(i) Hire and fire an executive director for the office who has
training and experience in foster care; and
(ii) Support and facilitate the work of the office, including the
tracking of children in foster care and reviewing foster care file audit
case reviews.
(3) The executive director of the office shall hire, fire, and
supervise office staff and shall be responsible for the duties of the
office as provided by law, including the annual report and other
reporting, review, tracking, data collection and analysis, and oversight
and training of local boards.
Sec. 55. Section 43-1303, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
-67-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
43-1303 (1) The office shall maintain the statewide register of all
foster care placements occurring within the state, and there shall be a
weekly report made to the registry of all foster care placements by the
Department of Health and Human Services, any child-placing agency, or any
court in a form as developed by the office in consultation with
representatives of entities required to make such reports. For each child
entering and leaving foster care, such report shall consist of
identifying information, placement information, the plan or permanency
plan developed by the person or court in charge of the child pursuant to
section 43-1312, and information on whether any such child was a person
immune from criminal prosecution under subsection (5) of section 28-801
or was considered a trafficking victim as defined in section 28-830. The
department, the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation
Administration, and every court and child-placing agency shall report any
foster care placement within three working days. The report shall contain
the following information:
(a) Child identification information, including name, date of birth,
gender, race, religion, and ethnicity;
(b) Identification information for parents and stepparents,
including name, address, and status of parental rights;
(c) Placement information, including (i) initial placement date,
(ii) current placement date, (iii) the name and address of the foster
care placement, (iv) if a relative placement or kinship placement,
whether the foster care placement is licensed, and (v) whether the foster
care placement has received a waiver pursuant to section 71-1904 and the
basis for such waiver;
(d) Court status information, including which court has
jurisdiction, initial custody date, court hearing date, and results of
the court hearing;
(e) Agency or other entity having custody of the child; and
(f) Case worker, probation officer, or person providing direct case
-68-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
management or supervision functions.
(2)(a) The Foster Care Review Office shall designate a local board
to conduct foster care file audit case reviews for each case of children
in foster care placement.
(b) The office may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for
the following:
(i) Establishment of training programs for local board members which
shall include an initial training program and periodic inservice training
programs;
(ii) Development of procedures for local boards;
(iii) Establishment of a central record-keeping facility for all
local board files, including foster care file audit case reviews;
(iv) Accumulation of data and the making of annual reports on
children in foster care placements. Such reports shall include, but not
be limited to, (A) personal data on length of time in foster care, (B)
number of placements, (C) frequency and results of foster care file audit
case reviews and court review hearings, (D) number of children supervised
by the foster care programs in the state annually, (E) trend data
impacting foster care, services, and placements, (F) analysis of the
data, and (G) recommendations for improving the foster care system in
Nebraska;
(v) Accumulation of data and the making of quarterly reports
regarding the children in foster care placements;
(vi) To the extent not prohibited by section 43-1310, evaluation of
the judicial and administrative data collected on foster care and the
dissemination of such data to the judiciary, public and private agencies,
the department, and members of the public; and
(vii) Manner in which the office shall determine the appropriateness
of requesting a court review hearing as provided for in section 43-1313.
(3) A local board shall send a written report to the office for each
foster care file audit case review conducted by the local board. A court
-69-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
shall send a written report to the office for each foster care review
hearing conducted by the court.
(4)(a) The office shall report and make recommendations to the
Legislature, the department, the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of
Probation Administration, the courts, local boards, and county welfare
offices.
(b) Such reports and recommendations shall include, but not be
limited to, the annual judicial and administrative data collected on
foster care pursuant to subsections (2) and (3) of this section and the
annual evaluation of such data.
(c) The Foster Care Review Office shall provide copies of such
reports and recommendations to each court having the authority to make
foster care placements.
(d) The executive director of the office shall provide reports
regarding child welfare and juvenile justice data and information on
March 1, June 1, September 1, and December 1. The September 1 report
shall be the annual report. The executive director shall provide
additional reports at a time specified by the Health and Human Services
Committee of the Legislature. The reports shall include issues, policy
concerns, problems which have come to the attention of the office, and
analysis of the data. The reports shall recommend alternatives to the
identified problems and related needs of the foster care system. The
reports and recommendations submitted to the Legislature shall be
submitted electronically.
(e) The Health and Human Services Committee shall coordinate and
prioritize data and information requests submitted to the office by
members of the Legislature.
(5) The executive director of the office or his or her designees
from the office may visit and observe foster care facilities in order to
ascertain whether the individual physical, psychological, and
sociological needs of each foster child are being met.
-70-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(6) At the request of any state agency, the executive director of
the office or his or her designees from the office may conduct a case
file review process and data analysis regarding any state ward or ward of
the court whether placed in-home or out-of-home at the time of the case
file review.
Sec. 56. Section 43-1304, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-1304 There shall be local foster care review boards to conduct
the foster care file audit case reviews of children in foster care
placement and carry out other powers and duties given to such boards
under the Foster Care Review Act. The executive director of the office
shall select members to serve on local boards from a list of applications
submitted to the office. Each local board shall consist of not less than
four and not more than ten members as determined by the executive
director. The members of the local board shall reasonably represent the
various social, economic, racial, and ethnic groups of the county or
counties from which its members may be appointed. A person employed by
the office, the Department of Health and Human Services, a residential
child-caring agency, a child-placing agency, or a court shall not be
appointed to a local board. A list of the members of each local board
shall be sent to the department and the Juvenile Probation Agency Office
of Probation Administration.
Sec. 57. Section 43-1309, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-1309 Upon the request of the office or designated local board,
any records pertaining to a case assigned to such local board shall be
furnished to the office or designated local board by the Department of
Health and Human Services, by any public official or employee of a
political subdivision having relevant contact with the child, or, upon
court order, by the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation
Administration. Upon the request of the Foster Care Review Office or
-71-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
designated local board, and if such information is not obtainable
elsewhere, the court having jurisdiction of the foster child shall
release such information to the office or designated local board as the
court deems necessary to determine the physical, psychological, and
sociological circumstances of such foster child.
Sec. 58. Section 43-1311.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-1311.03 (1) When a child placed in foster care turns fourteen
years of age or enters foster care and is at least fourteen years of age,
a written independent living transition proposal shall be developed by
the Department of Health and Human Services at the direction and
involvement of the child to prepare for the transition from foster care
to successful adulthood. Any revision or addition to such proposal shall
also be made in consultation with the child. The transition proposal
shall be personalized based on the child's needs and shall describe the
services needed for the child to transition to a successful adulthood as
provided in the Nebraska Strengthening Families Act. The transition
proposal shall include, but not be limited to, the following needs and
the services needed for the child to transition to a successful adulthood
as provided in the Nebraska Strengthening Families Act:
(a) Education;
(b) Employment services and other workforce support;
(c) Health and health care coverage, including the child's potential
eligibility for medicaid coverage under the federal Patient Protection
and Affordable Care Act, 42 U.S.C. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(IX), as such act
and section existed on January 1, 2013;
(d) Behavioral health treatment and support needs and access to such
treatment and support;
(e) Financial assistance, including education on credit card
financing, banking, and other services;
(f) Housing;
-72-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(g) Relationship development and permanent connections;
(h) Adult services, if the needs assessment indicates that the child
is reasonably likely to need or be eligible for services or other support
from the adult services system; and
(i) Information, planning, and assistance to obtain a driver's
license as allowed under state law and consistent with subdivision (9)(b)
(iv) of this section, including, but not limited to, providing the child
with a copy of a driver's manual, identifying driver safety courses and
resources to access a driver safety course, and identifying potential
means by which to access a motor vehicle for such purposes.
(2) The transition proposal shall be developed and frequently
reviewed by the department in collaboration with the child's transition
team. The transition team shall be comprised of the child, the child's
caseworker, the child's guardian ad litem, individuals selected by the
child, and individuals who have knowledge of services available to the
child. As provided in the Nebraska Strengthening Families Act, one of the
individuals selected by the child may be designated as the child's
advisor and, as necessary, advocate for the child with respect to the
application of the reasonable and prudent parent standard and for the
child on normalcy activities. The department may reject an individual
selected by the child to be a member of the team if the department has
good cause to believe the individual would not act in the best interests
of the child.
(3) The transition proposal shall be considered a working document
and shall be, at the least, updated for and reviewed at every permanency
or review hearing by the court. The court shall determine whether the
transition proposal includes the services needed to assist the child to
make the transition from foster care to a successful adulthood.
(4) The transition proposal shall document what efforts were made to
involve and engage the child in the development of the transition
proposal and any revisions or additions to the transition proposal. As
-73-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
provided in the Nebraska Strengthening Families Act, the court shall ask
the child, in an age or developmentally appropriate manner, about his or
her involvement in the development of the transition proposal and any
revisions or additions to such proposal. As provided in the Nebraska
Strengthening Families Act, the court shall make a finding as to the
child's involvement in the development of the transition proposal and any
revisions or additions to such proposal.
(5) The final transition proposal prior to the child's leaving
foster care shall specifically identify how the need for housing will be
addressed.
(6) If the child is interested in pursuing higher education, the
transition proposal shall provide for the process in applying for any
applicable state, federal, or private aid.
(7) The department shall provide without cost a copy of any consumer
report as defined in 15 U.S.C. 1681a(d), as such section existed on
January 1, 2016, pertaining to the child each year until the child is
discharged from care and assistance, including when feasible, from the
child's guardian ad litem, in interpreting and resolving any inaccuracies
in the report as provided in the Nebraska Strengthening Families Act.
(8)(a) Any child who is adjudicated to be a juvenile described in
(i) subdivision (3)(a) of section 43-247 and who is in an out-of-home
placement or (ii) subdivision (8) of section 43-247 and whose
guardianship or state-funded adoption assistance agreement was disrupted
or terminated after the child had attained the age of sixteen years,
shall receive information regarding the Young Adult Bridge to
Independence Act and the bridge to independence program available under
the act.
(b) The department shall create a clear and developmentally
appropriate written notice discussing the rights of eligible young adults
to participate in the program. The notice shall include information about
eligibility and requirements to participate in the program, the extended
-74-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
services and support that young adults are eligible to receive under the
program, and how young adults can be a part of the program. The notice
shall also include information about the young adult's right to request a
client-directed attorney to represent the young adult pursuant to section
43-4510 and the benefits and role of an attorney.
(c) The department shall disseminate this information to any child
who was adjudicated to be a juvenile described in subdivision (3)(a) of
section 43-247 and who is in an out-of-home placement at sixteen years of
age and any child who was adjudicated to be a juvenile under subdivision
(8) of section 43-247 and whose guardianship or state-funded adoption
assistance agreement was disrupted or terminated after the child had
attained the age of sixteen years. The department shall disseminate this
information to any such child yearly thereafter until such child attains
the age of nineteen years and not later than ninety days prior to the
child's last court review before attaining nineteen years of age or being
discharged from foster care to independent living. In addition to
providing the written notice, not later than ninety days prior to the
child's last court review before attaining nineteen years of age or being
discharged from foster care to independent living, a representative of
the department shall explain the information contained in the notice to
the child in person and the timeline necessary to avoid a lapse in
services and support.
(d)(i) On and after January 1, 2025, a child adjudicated to be a
juvenile as described in subdivision (1), (2), or (3)(b) of section
43-247 and who is in a court-ordered out-of-home placement in the six
months prior to attaining nineteen years of age shall receive information
regarding the Young Adult Bridge to Independence Act and the bridge to
independence program available under the act. The Juvenile Probation
Agency Office of Probation Administration shall identify any such
juvenile and provide the juvenile with information regarding the Young
Adult Bridge to Independence Act and the bridge to independence program
-75-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
available under the act.
(ii) Any party to such juvenile's court case, or the court upon its
own motion, may request a hearing in the six months prior to the juvenile
attaining nineteen years of age for the court to consider whether it is
necessary for the juvenile to remain in the court-ordered out-of-home
placement if the requesting party or the court believes it would be
contrary to the juvenile's welfare to return to the family home. The
following factors may guide the court in finding whether or not return to
the family home would be contrary to the juvenile's welfare:
(A) Whether the juvenile is disconnected from family support that
would assist the juvenile in transitioning to adulthood;
(B) Whether the juvenile faces the risk of homelessness upon closure
of the juvenile court case; or
(C) Whether the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation
Administration has made reasonable efforts to return the juvenile to the
family home prior to the juvenile's nineteenth birthday.
(iii) The court shall set forth its finding in a written order. If
the court finds that return to the family home would be contrary to the
juvenile's welfare, the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation
Administration shall notify the Department of Health and Human Services
within ten days after such finding is made. As soon as practicable
thereafter and prior to the child's nineteenth birthday, a representative
of the department shall explain the information contained in the written
notice described in this subsection to the juvenile in person and the
timeline necessary to avoid a lapse in services and support. If the
juvenile remains in a court-ordered out-of-home placement upon attaining
nineteen years of age pursuant to a court order as described in section
43-4504, the department shall proceed pursuant to sections 43-4506 and
43-4508.
(iv) A juvenile with a current pending motion to revoke probation
before the court at the time of the hearing shall not be eligible for the
-76-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
Young Adult Bridge to Independence Act.
(9)(a) The department shall provide the child with the documents,
information, records, and other materials described in subdivision (9)(b)
of this section, (i) if the child is leaving foster care, on or before
the date the child reaches eighteen or nineteen years of age or twenty-
one years of age if the child participates in the bridge to independence
program, and (ii) at the age or as otherwise prescribed in subdivision
(9)(b) of this section.
(b) The department shall provide the child with:
(i) A certified copy of the child's birth certificate and facilitate
securing a federal social security card when the child is eligible for
such card;
(ii) Health insurance information and all documentation required for
enrollment in medicaid coverage for former foster care children as
available under the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act,
42 U.S.C. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(IX), as such act and section existed on
January 1, 2013;
(iii) A copy of the child's medical records;
(iv) A driver's license or identification card issued by a state in
accordance with the requirements of section 202 of the REAL ID Act of
2005, as such section existed on January 1, 2016, and when requested by a
child fourteen years of age or older, all documents necessary to obtain
such license or card;
(v) A copy of the child's educational records;
(vi) A credit report check;
(vii) Contact information, with permission, for family members,
including siblings, with whom the child can maintain a safe and
appropriate relationship, and other supportive adults;
(viii) A list of local community resources, including, but not
limited to, support groups, health clinics, mental and behavioral health
and substance abuse treatment services and support, pregnancy and
-77-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
parenting resources, and employment and housing agencies;
(ix) Written information, including, but not limited to, contact
information, for disability resources or benefits that may assist the
child as an adult, specifically including information regarding state
programs established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 677, as such section existed
on January 1, 2016, and disability benefits, including supplemental
security income pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 1382 et seq., as such sections
existed on January 1, 2016, or social security disability insurance
pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 423, as such section existed on January 1, 2016, if
the child may be eligible as an adult;
(x) An application for public assistance and information on how to
access the system to determine public assistance eligibility;
(xi) A letter prepared by the department that verifies the child's
name and date of birth, dates the child was in foster care, and whether
the child was in foster care on his or her eighteenth, nineteenth, or
twenty-first birthday and enrolled in medicaid while in foster care;
(xii) Written information about the child's Indian heritage or
tribal connection, if any; and
(xiii) Written information on how to access personal documents in
the future.
(c) All fees associated with securing the certified copy of the
child's birth certificate or obtaining a driver's license or a state
identification card shall be waived by the state.
(d) The transition proposal shall document that the child was
provided all of the documents listed in this subsection. The court shall
make a finding as to whether the child has received the documents as part
of the independence hearing as provided in subdivision (2)(d) of section
43-285.
Sec. 59. Section 43-1503, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-1503 For purposes of the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act,
-78-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
except as may be specifically provided otherwise:
(1) Active efforts shall mean and include, but not be limited to:
(a) A concerted level of casework, both prior to and after the
removal of an Indian child, exceeding the level that is required under
reasonable efforts to preserve and reunify the family described in
section 43-283.01 in a manner consistent with the prevailing social and
cultural conditions and way of life of the Indian child's tribe or tribes
to the extent possible under the circumstances;
(b) A request to the Indian child's tribe or tribes and extended
family known to the department or the state to convene traditional and
customary support and services;
(c) Actively engaging, assisting, and monitoring the family's access
to and progress in culturally appropriate and available resources of the
Indian child's extended family members, tribal service area, Indian tribe
or tribes, and individual Indian caregivers;
(d) Identification of and provision of information to the Indian
child's extended family members known to the department or the state
concerning appropriate community, state, and federal resources that may
be able to offer housing, financial, and transportation assistance and
actively assisting the family in accessing such community, state, and
federal resources;
(e) Identification of and attempts to engage tribally designated
Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act representatives;
(f) Consultation with extended family members known to the
department or the state, or a tribally designated Nebraska Indian Child
Welfare Act representative if an extended family member cannot be
located, to identify family or tribal support services that could be
provided by extended family members or other tribal members if extended
family members cannot be located;
(g) Exhaustion of all available tribally appropriate family
preservation alternatives; and
-79-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(h) When the department or the state is involved in a proceeding
under the act, the department or the state shall provide a written report
of its attempt to provide active efforts to the court at every hearing
involving an Indian child. This report shall be sent to the Indian
child's tribe or tribes within three days after being filed with the
court and shall be deemed to be admissible evidence of active efforts in
proceedings conducted under the act;
(2) Best interests of the Indian child shall include:
(a) Using practices in compliance with the federal Indian Child
Welfare Act, the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act, and other applicable
laws that are designed to prevent the Indian child's voluntary or
involuntary out-of-home placement; and
(b) Whenever an out-of-home placement is necessary, placing the
child, to the greatest extent possible, in a foster home, adoptive
placement, or other type of custodial placement that reflects the unique
values of the Indian child's tribal culture and is best able to assist
the child in establishing, developing, and maintaining a political,
cultural, and social relationship with the Indian child's tribe or tribes
and tribal community;
(3) Child custody proceeding shall mean and include:
(a) Foster care placement which shall mean any action removing an
Indian child from his or her parent or Indian custodian for temporary or
emergency placement in a foster home or institution or the home of a
guardian or conservator where the parent or Indian custodian cannot have
the child returned upon demand, but where parental rights have not been
terminated;
(b) Termination of parental rights which shall mean any action
resulting in the termination of the parent-child relationship;
(c) Preadoptive placement which shall mean the temporary placement
of an Indian child in a foster home or institution after the termination
of parental rights, but prior to or in lieu of adoptive placement;
-80-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(d) Adoptive placement which shall mean the permanent placement of
an Indian child for adoption, including any action resulting in a final
decree of adoption; and
(e) Voluntary foster care placement which shall mean a non-court-
involved proceeding in which the department or the state is facilitating
a voluntary foster care placement or in-home services to families at risk
of entering the foster care system. An Indian child, parent, or tribe
involved in a voluntary foster care placement shall only be provided
protections as provided in subsection (4) of section 43-1505 and sections
43-1506 and 43-1508.
Such term or terms shall not include a placement based upon an act
which, if committed by an adult, would be deemed a crime or upon an
award, in a divorce proceeding, of custody to one of the parents;
(4) The department or the state shall mean the applicable state
social services entity that is involved with the provision of services to
Indian children, specifically the Department of Health and Human Services
and the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration in
certain cases;
(5) Extended family member shall be as defined by the law or custom
of the Indian child's primary tribe or, in the absence of such laws or
customs of the primary tribe, the law or custom of the Indian child's
other tribes or, in the absence of such law or custom, shall mean a
person who has reached the age of eighteen and who is the Indian child's
parent, grandparent, aunt or uncle, clan member, band member, sibling,
brother-in-law or sister-in-law, niece or nephew, cousin, or stepparent;
(6) Federal Indian Child Welfare Act shall mean the federal Indian
Child Welfare Act of 1978, 25 U.S.C. 1901 et seq.;
(7) Indian shall mean any person who is a member of an Indian tribe,
or who is an Alaska Native and a member of a regional corporation defined
in section 7 of the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act, 43 U.S.C. 1606;
(8) Indian child shall mean any unmarried person who is under age
-81-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
eighteen and is either (a) a member of an Indian tribe or (b) is eligible
for membership in an Indian tribe and is the biological child of a member
of an Indian tribe;
(9) Indian child's primary tribe shall mean, in the case of an
Indian child that is a member or eligible for membership in multiple
tribes, the tribe determined by the procedure enumerated in subsection
(4) of section 43-1504;
(10) Indian child's tribe or tribes shall mean the Indian tribe or
tribes in which an Indian child is a member or eligible for membership;
(11) Indian custodian shall mean any Indian person who has legal
custody of an Indian child under tribal law or custom or under state law
or to whom temporary physical care, custody, and control has been
transferred by the parent of such child;
(12) Indian organization shall mean any group, association,
partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal
entity owned or controlled by Indians or a majority of whose members are
Indians;
(13) Indian tribe shall mean any Indian tribe, band, nation, or
other organized group or community of Indians recognized as eligible for
the services provided to Indians by the secretary because of their status
as Indians, including any Alaska Native village as defined in section
3(c) of the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act, as amended, 43 U.S.C.
1602(c);
(14) Parent means any biological parent or parents of an Indian
child or any Indian person who has lawfully adopted an Indian child,
including adoptions under tribal law or custom. It does not include the
unwed father when paternity has not been acknowledged or established;
(15) Qualified expert witness shall mean one of the following
persons, in descending priority order although a court may assess the
credibility of individual witnesses:
(a) A member of the Indian child's tribe or tribes who is recognized
-82-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
by the tribal community as knowledgeable in tribal customs as they
pertain to family and childrearing practices;
(b) A member of another tribe who is recognized to be a qualified
expert witness by the Indian child's tribe or tribes based on his or her
knowledge of the delivery of child and family services to Indians and the
Indian child's tribe or tribes;
(c) A lay expert witness that possesses substantial experience in
the delivery of child and family services to Indians and extensive
knowledge of prevailing social and cultural standards and childrearing
practices within the Indian child's tribe or tribes;
(d) A professional person having substantial education and
experience in the area of his or her specialty who can demonstrate
knowledge of the prevailing social and cultural standards and
childrearing practices within the Indian child's tribe or tribes; or
(e) Any other professional person having substantial education in
the area of his or her specialty;
(16) Reservation shall mean Indian country as defined in 18 U.S.C.
1151 and any lands, not covered under such section, title to which is
either held by the United States in trust for the benefit of any Indian
tribe or individual or held by any Indian tribe or individual subject to
a restriction by the United States against alienation or a federally
designated or established service area which means a geographic area
designated by the United States where federal services and benefits
furnished to Indians and Indian tribes are provided or which is otherwise
designated to constitute an area on or near a reservation;
(17) Secretary shall mean the Secretary of the United States
Department of the Interior;
(18) Tribal court shall mean a court with jurisdiction over child
custody proceedings and which is either a Court of Indian Offenses, a
court established and operated under the code or custom of an Indian
tribe, or any other administrative body of a tribe which is vested with
-83-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
authority over child custody proceedings; and
(19) Tribal service area shall mean a geographic area, as defined by
the applicable Indian tribe or tribes, in which tribal services and
programs are provided to Indians.
Sec. 60. Section 43-2404.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-2404.01 (1) To be eligible for participation in either the
Commission Grant Program or the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid
Program, a comprehensive juvenile services plan shall be developed,
adopted, and submitted to the commission in accordance with the federal
act and rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission
in consultation with the Director of the Community-based Juvenile
Services Aid Program, the Director of Juvenile Diversion Programs, the
Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration, and the
University of Nebraska at Omaha, Juvenile Justice Institute. Such plan
may be developed by eligible applicants for the Commission Grant Program
and by individual counties, by multiple counties, by federally recognized
or state-recognized Indian tribes, or by any combination of the three for
the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program. Comprehensive juvenile
services plans shall:
(a) Be developed by a comprehensive community team representing
juvenile justice system stakeholders;
(b) Be based on data relevant to juvenile and family issues,
including an examination of disproportionate minority contact in order to
identify juvenile delinquency prevention efforts and system improvement
efforts designed to reduce, without establishing or requiring numerical
standards or quotas, the disproportionate number of juvenile members of
minority groups who come into contact with the juvenile justice system;
(c) Identify policies and practices that are research-based or
standardized and reliable and are implemented with fidelity and which
have been researched and demonstrate positive outcomes;
-84-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(d) Identify clear implementation strategies; and
(e) Identify how the impact of the program or service will be
measured.
(2) Any portion of the comprehensive juvenile services plan dealing
with administration, procedures, and programs of the juvenile court shall
not be submitted to the commission without the concurrence of the
presiding judge or judges of the court or courts having jurisdiction in
juvenile cases for the geographic area to be served. Programs or services
established by such plans shall conform to the family policy tenets
prescribed in sections 43-532 and 43-533 and shall include policies and
practices that are research-based or standardized and reliable and are
implemented with fidelity and which have been researched and demonstrate
positive outcomes.
(3) The commission, in consultation with the University of Nebraska
at Omaha, Juvenile Justice Institute, shall contract for the development
and administration of a statewide system to monitor and evaluate the
effectiveness of plans and programs receiving funds from (a) the
Commission Grant Program and (b) the Community-based Juvenile Services
Aid Program in preventing persons from entering the juvenile justice
system and in rehabilitating juvenile offenders, including an examination
of disproportionate minority contact in order to identify juvenile
delinquency prevention efforts and system improvement efforts designed to
reduce, without establishing or requiring numerical standards or quotas,
the disproportionate number of juvenile members of minority groups who
come into contact with the juvenile justice system.
(4) There is established within the commission the position of
Director of the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program, appointed
by the executive director of the commission. The director shall have
extensive experience in developing and providing community-based
services.
(5) The director shall be supervised by the executive director of
-85-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
the commission. The director shall:
(a) Provide technical assistance and guidance for the development of
comprehensive juvenile services plans;
(b) Coordinate the review of the Community-based Juvenile Services
Aid Program application as provided in section 43-2404.02 and make
recommendations for the distribution of funds provided under the
Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program, giving priority to those
grant applications funding programs and services that will divert
juveniles from the juvenile justice system, impact and effectively treat
juveniles within the juvenile justice system, and reduce the juvenile
detention population or assist juveniles in transitioning from out-of-
home placements to in-home treatments. The director shall ensure that no
funds appropriated or distributed under the Community-based Juvenile
Services Aid Program are used for purposes prohibited under subsection
(3) of section 43-2404.02;
(c) Develop data collection and evaluation protocols, oversee
statewide data collection, and generate an annual report on the
effectiveness of juvenile services that receive funds from the Community-
based Juvenile Services Aid Program, including an examination of
disproportionate minority contact in order to identify juvenile
delinquency prevention efforts and system improvement efforts designed to
reduce, without establishing or requiring numerical standards or quotas,
the disproportionate number of juvenile members of minority groups who
come into contact with the juvenile justice system;
(d) Develop relationships and collaborate with juvenile justice
system stakeholders, provide education and training as necessary, and
serve on boards and committees when approved by the commission;
(e) Assist juvenile justice system stakeholders in developing
policies and practices that are research-based or standardized and
reliable and are implemented with fidelity and which have been researched
and demonstrate positive outcomes, including an examination of
-86-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
disproportionate minority contact in order to identify juvenile
delinquency prevention efforts and system improvement efforts designed to
reduce, without establishing or requiring numerical standards or quotas,
the disproportionate number of juvenile members of minority groups who
come into contact with the juvenile justice system;
(f) Develop and coordinate a statewide working group as a
subcommittee of the coalition to assist in regular strategic planning
related to supporting, funding, monitoring, and evaluating the
effectiveness of plans and programs receiving funds from the Community-
based Juvenile Services Aid Program; and
(g) Work with the coalition in facilitating the coalition's
obligations under the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program.
Sec. 61. Section 43-2404.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-2404.02 (1) There is created a separate and distinct budgetary
program within the commission to be known as the Community-based Juvenile
Services Aid Program. Funding acquired from participation in the federal
act, state General Funds, and funding acquired from other sources which
may be used for purposes consistent with the Juvenile Services Act and
the federal act shall be used to aid in the establishment and provision
of community-based services for juveniles who come in contact with the
juvenile justice system.
(2)(a) Ten percent of the annual General Fund appropriation to the
Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program, excluding administrative
budget funds, shall be set aside for the development of a common data set
and evaluation of the effectiveness of the Community-based Juvenile
Services Aid Program. The intent in creating this common data set is to
allow for evaluation of the use of the funds and the effectiveness of the
programs or outcomes in the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid
Program.
(b) The common data set shall be developed and maintained by the
-87-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
commission and shall serve as a primary data collection site for any
intervention funded by the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program
designed to serve juveniles and deter involvement in the formal juvenile
justice system. The commission shall work with agencies and programs to
enhance existing data sets. To ensure that the data set permits
evaluation of recidivism and other measures, the commission shall work
with the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration,
juvenile diversion programs, law enforcement, the courts, and others to
compile data that demonstrates whether a youth has moved deeper into the
juvenile justice system. The University of Nebraska at Omaha, Juvenile
Justice Institute, shall assist with the development of common
definitions, variables, and training required for data collection and
reporting into the common data set by juvenile justice programs. The
common data set maintained by the commission shall be provided to the
University of Nebraska at Omaha, Juvenile Justice Institute, to assess
the effectiveness of the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program.
(c) Providing the commission access to records and information for,
as well as the commission granting access to records and information
from, the common data set is not a violation of confidentiality
provisions under any law, rule, or regulation if done in good faith for
purposes of evaluation. Records and documents, regardless of physical
form, that are obtained or produced or presented to the commission for
the common data set are not public records for purposes of sections
84-712 to 84-712.09.
(d) The ten percent of the annual General Fund appropriation to the
Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program, excluding administrative
budget funds, shall be appropriated as follows: In fiscal year 2015-16,
seven percent shall go to the commission for development of the common
data set and three percent shall go to the University of Nebraska at
Omaha, Juvenile Justice Institute, for evaluation. In fiscal year
2016-17, six percent shall go to the commission for development and
-88-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
maintenance of the common data set and four percent shall go to the
University of Nebraska at Omaha, Juvenile Justice Institute, for
evaluation. Every fiscal year thereafter, beginning in fiscal year
2017-18, five percent shall go to the commission for development and
maintenance of the common data set and five percent shall go to the
University of Nebraska at Omaha, Juvenile Justice Institute, for
evaluation.
(e) The remaining funds in the annual General Fund appropriation to
the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program shall be apportioned as
aid in accordance with a formula established in rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated by the commission. The formula shall be based on
the total number of residents per county and federally recognized or
state-recognized Indian tribe who are twelve years of age through
eighteen years of age and other relevant factors as determined by the
commission. The commission may require a local match of up to forty
percent from the county, multiple counties, federally recognized or
state-recognized Indian tribe or tribes, or any combination of the three
which is receiving aid under such program. Any local expenditures for
community-based programs for juveniles may be applied toward such match
requirement.
(3)(a) In distributing funds provided under the Community-based
Juvenile Services Aid Program, aid recipients shall prioritize programs
and services that will divert juveniles from the juvenile justice system,
reduce the population of juveniles in juvenile detention and secure
confinement, and assist in transitioning juveniles from out-of-home
placements.
(b) Funds received under the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid
Program shall be used exclusively to assist the aid recipient in the
implementation and operation of programs or the provision of services
identified in the aid recipient's comprehensive juvenile services plan,
including programs for local planning and service coordination;
-89-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
screening, assessment, and evaluation; diversion; alternatives to
detention; family support services; treatment services; truancy
prevention and intervention programs; pilot projects approved by the
commission; payment of transportation costs to and from placements,
evaluations, or services; personnel when the personnel are aligned with
evidence-based treatment principles, programs, or practices; contracting
with other state agencies or private organizations that provide evidence-
based treatment or programs; preexisting programs that are aligned with
evidence-based practices or best practices; and other services that will
positively impact juveniles and families in the juvenile justice system.
(c) Funds received under the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid
Program may be used one time by an aid recipient:
(i) To convert an existing juvenile detention facility or other
existing structure for use as an alternative to detention as defined in
section 43-245;
(ii) To invest in capital construction, including both new
construction and renovations, for a facility for use as an alternative to
detention; or
(iii) For the initial lease of a facility for use as an alternative
to detention.
(d) Funds received under the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid
Program shall not be used for the following:
(i) Construction of secure detention facilities, secure youth
treatment facilities, or secure youth confinement facilities;
(ii) Capital construction or the lease or acquisition of facilities
beyond the one-time use described in subdivision (3)(c) of this section;
(iii) Programs, services, treatments, evaluations, or other
preadjudication services that are not based on or grounded in evidence-
based practices, principles, and research, except that the commission may
approve pilot projects that authorize the use of such aid; or
(iv) Office equipment, office supplies, or office space.
-90-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(e) Any aid not distributed to counties under this subsection shall
be retained by the commission to be distributed on a competitive basis
under the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program for a county,
multiple counties, federally recognized or state-recognized Indian tribe
or tribes, or any combination of the three demonstrating additional need
in the funding areas identified in this subsection.
(f) If a county, multiple counties, or a federally recognized or
state-recognized Indian tribe or tribes is denied aid under this section
or receives no aid under this section, the entity may request an appeal
pursuant to the appeal process in rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated by the commission. The commission shall establish appeal and
hearing procedures by December 15, 2014. The commission shall make appeal
and hearing procedures available on its website.
(4)(a) Any recipient of aid under the Community-based Juvenile
Services Aid Program shall electronically file an annual report as
required by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the
commission. Any program funded through the Community-based Juvenile
Services Aid Program that served juveniles shall report data on the
individual youth served. Any program that is not directly serving youth
shall include program-level data. In either case, data collected shall
include, but not be limited to, the following: The type of juvenile
service, how the service met the goals of the comprehensive juvenile
services plan, demographic information on the juveniles served, program
outcomes, the total number of juveniles served, and the number of
juveniles who completed the program or intervention.
(b) Any recipient of aid under the Community-based Juvenile Services
Aid Program shall be assisted by the University of Nebraska at Omaha,
Juvenile Justice Institute, in reporting in the common data set, as set
forth in the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the
commission. Community-based aid utilization and evaluation data shall be
stored and maintained by the commission.
-91-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(c) Evaluation of the use of funds and the evidence of the
effectiveness of the programs shall be completed by the University of
Nebraska at Omaha, Juvenile Justice Institute, specifically:
(i) The varying rates of recidivism, as defined by rules and
regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission, and other measures
for juveniles participating in community-based programs; and
(ii) Whether juveniles are sent to staff secure or secure juvenile
detention after participating in a program funded by the Community-based
Juvenile Services Aid Program.
(5) The commission shall report annually to the Governor and the
Legislature on the distribution and use of funds for aid appropriated
under the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program. The report shall
include, but not be limited to, an aggregate report of the use of the
Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program funds, including the types
of juvenile services and programs that were funded, whether any
recipients used the funds for a purpose described in subdivision (3)(c)
of this section, demographic information on the total number of juveniles
served, program success rates, the total number of juveniles sent to
secure juvenile detention or residential treatment and secure
confinement, and a listing of the expenditures of all counties and
federally recognized or state-recognized Indian tribes for detention,
residential treatment, and secure confinement. The report submitted to
the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.
(6) The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
for the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program in consultation
with the Director of the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program,
the Director of Juvenile Diversion Programs, the Juvenile Probation
Agency Office of Probation Administration, the Nebraska Association of
County Officials, and the University of Nebraska at Omaha, Juvenile
Justice Institute. The rules and regulations shall include, but not be
limited to:
-92-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(a) The required elements of a comprehensive juvenile services plan
and planning process;
(b) The Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program formula,
review process, match requirements, and fund distribution. The
distribution process shall ensure a conflict of interest policy;
(c) A distribution process for funds retained under subsection (3)
of this section;
(d) A plan for evaluating the effectiveness of plans and programs
receiving funding;
(e) A reporting process for aid recipients;
(f) A reporting process for the commission to the Governor and
Legislature. The report shall be made electronically to the Governor and
the Legislature; and
(g) Requirements regarding the use of the common data set.
Sec. 62. Section 43-2411, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-2411 (1) The Nebraska Coalition for Juvenile Justice is created.
Coalition members who are members of the judicial branch of government
shall be nonvoting members of the coalition. The coalition members shall
be appointed by the Governor and shall include the members required under
subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(2) Before June 15, 2018:
(a) As provided in the federal act, there shall be no less than
fifteen nor more than thirty-three members of the coalition;
(b) The coalition shall include:
(i) The Administrator of the Office of Juvenile Services;
(ii) The chief executive officer of the Department of Health and
Human Services or his or her designee;
(iii) The Commissioner of Education or his or her designee;
(iv) The executive director of the Nebraska Commission on Law
Enforcement and Criminal Justice or his or her designee;
-93-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(v) The executive director of the Nebraska Association of County
Officials or his or her designee;
(vi) The probation administrator of the Office of Probation
Administration or his or her designee;
(vii) One county commissioner or supervisor;
(viii) One person with data analysis experience;
(ix) One police chief;
(x) One sheriff;
(xi) The executive director of the Foster Care Review Office;
(xii) One separate juvenile court judge;
(xiii) One county court judge;
(xiv) One representative of mental health professionals who works
directly with juveniles;
(xv) Three representatives, one from each congressional district,
from community-based, private nonprofit organizations who work with
juvenile offenders and their families;
(xvi) One volunteer who works with juvenile offenders or potential
juvenile offenders;
(xvii) One person who works with an alternative to a detention
program for juveniles;
(xviii) The director or his or her designee from a youth
rehabilitation and treatment center;
(xix) The director or his or her designee from a secure juvenile
detention facility;
(xx) The director or his or her designee from a staff secure youth
confinement facility;
(xxi) At least five members who are under twenty-four years of age
when appointed;
(xxii) One person who works directly with juveniles who have
learning or emotional difficulties or are abused or neglected;
(xxiii) One member of the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and
-94-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
Criminal Justice;
(xxiv) One member of a regional behavioral health authority
established under section 71-808;
(xxv) One county attorney; and
(xxvi) One public defender;
(c) A majority of the coalition members, including the chairperson,
shall not be full-time employees of federal, state, or local government.
At least one-fifth of the coalition members shall be under the age of
twenty-four years at the time of appointment; and
(d) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the terms
of members appointed pursuant to subdivisions (2)(b)(vii) through (2)(b)
(xxvi) of this section shall be three years, except that the terms of the
initial appointments of members of the coalition shall be staggered so
that one-third of the members are appointed for terms of one year, one-
third for terms of two years, and one-third for terms of three years, as
determined by the Governor.
(3) On and after June 15, 2018, the coalition shall include:
(a) The chief executive officer of the Department of Health and
Human Services or his or her designee;
(b) The Commissioner of Education or his or her designee;
(c) The executive director of the Nebraska Commission on Law
Enforcement and Criminal Justice or his or her designee;
(d) The executive director of the Nebraska Association of County
Officials or his or her designee;
(e) The Juvenile Probation Administrator probation administrator of
the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration or his
or her designee;
(f) One county commissioner or supervisor;
(g) One representative from law enforcement;
(h) The executive director of the Foster Care Review Office;
(i) One separate juvenile court judge;
-95-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(j) One county court judge;
(k) Three representatives, one from each congressional district,
from community-based, private nonprofit organizations who work with
juvenile offenders and their families;
(l) The director or his or her designee from a secure juvenile
detention facility or a staff secure youth confinement facility;
(m) At least one member who is under twenty-four years of age when
appointed, with juvenile justice experience preferred;
(n) One at-large member;
(o) One member of a regional behavioral health authority established
under section 71-808;
(p) One county attorney; and
(q) One juvenile public defender or defense attorney.
(4)(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) through (e) of this
subsection, members of the coalition serving prior to June 15, 2018,
shall continue to serve on the coalition as representatives of the entity
they were appointed to represent until their current terms of office
expire and their successors are appointed and confirmed.
(b) The terms of the members appointed pursuant to subdivisions (3)
(f) through (3)(q) of this section shall be three years.
(c) The positions created pursuant to subdivisions (2)(b)(i),
(viii), (x), (xiv), (xvi), (xvii), (xviii), (xx), (xxii), and (xxiii) of
this section shall cease to exist on June 15, 2018.
(d) The police chief appointed pursuant to subdivision (2)(b)(ix) of
this section shall continue to serve until the representative from law
enforcement under subdivision (3)(g) of this section is appointed.
(e) The director or his or her designee from a secure juvenile
detention facility appointed pursuant to subdivision (2)(b)(xix) of this
section shall continue to serve until the member under subdivision (3)(l)
of this section is appointed.
(5) Any vacancy on the coalition shall be filled by appointment by
-96-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
the Governor. The coalition shall select a chairperson, a vice-
chairperson, and such other officers as it deems necessary.
(6) Members of the coalition shall be reimbursed for expenses
pursuant to sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
(7) The coalition may appoint task forces or subcommittees to carry
out its work. Task force and subcommittee members shall have knowledge
of, responsibility for, or interest in an area related to the duties of
the coalition.
Sec. 63. Section 43-2412, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-2412 (1) Consistent with the purposes and objectives of the
Juvenile Services Act and the federal act, the coalition shall:
(a) Make recommendations to the commission on the awarding of grants
under the Commission Grant Program to eligible applicants;
(b) Prepare at least one report annually to the Governor, the
Legislature, the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation
Administration, and the Office of Juvenile Services. The report submitted
to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically;
(c) Ensure widespread citizen involvement in all phases of its work;
and
(d) Meet at least two times each year.
(2) Consistent with the purposes and objectives of the acts and
within the limits of available time and appropriations, the coalition
may:
(a) Assist and advise state and local agencies in the establishment
of volunteer training programs and the utilization of volunteers;
(b) Apply for and receive funds from federal and private sources for
carrying out its powers and duties;
(c) Provide technical assistance to eligible applicants;
(d) Identify juvenile justice issues, share information, and monitor
and evaluate programs in the juvenile justice system; and
-97-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(e) Recommend guidelines and supervision procedures to be used to
develop or expand local diversion programs for juveniles from the
juvenile justice system.
(3) In formulating, adopting, and promulgating the recommendations
and guidelines provided for in this section, the coalition shall consider
the differences among counties in population, in geography, and in the
availability of local resources.
Sec. 64. Section 43-4101, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-4101 (1) The Nebraska Juvenile Service Delivery Project shall be
established as a pilot program administered by the Juvenile Probation
Agency Office of Probation Administration. The pilot program shall be
evaluated by the University of Nebraska Medical Center's College of
Public Health. The project may be expanded by the agency Office of
Probation Administration. The purpose of the pilot program is to (a)
provide access to services in the community for juveniles placed on
probation, (b) prevent unnecessary commitment of juveniles to the
Department of Health and Human Services and to the Office of Juvenile
Services, (c) eliminate barriers preventing juveniles from receiving
needed services, (d) prevent unnecessary penetration of juveniles further
into the juvenile justice system, (e) enable the juvenile's needs to be
met in the least intrusive and least restrictive manner while maintaining
the safety of the juvenile and the community, (f) reduce the duplication
of resources within the juvenile justice system through intense
coordinated case management and supervision, and (g) use evidence-based
practices and responsive case management to improve outcomes for
adjudicated juveniles.
(2) On or before July 1, 2013, the Department of Health and Human
Services shall apply for reimbursement under Title IV-E of the federal
Social Security Act, as amended, for reimbursable costs associated with
the Nebraska Juvenile Service Delivery Project. The reimbursed funds
-98-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
received by the department shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Juvenile Probation Program Cash Fund for reimbursement of
expenses incurred by the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation
Administration pursuant to the Nebraska Juvenile Service Delivery
Project.
Sec. 65. Section 43-4102, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-4102 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Nebraska
Juvenile Service Delivery Project, established as a pilot program under
section 43-4101 within the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation
Administration, be expanded statewide in a three-step, phase-in process
beginning July 1, 2013, with full implementation by July 1, 2014. The
expansion of the project will result in the Juvenile Probation Agency
Office of Probation Administration taking over the duties of the Office
of Juvenile Services with respect to its previous functions of community
supervision and parole of juvenile law violators and of evaluations for
such juveniles. The Office of Juvenile Services shall continue for the
purpose of operating the youth rehabilitation and treatment centers and
the care and custody of the juveniles placed at such centers. Expansion
of the project shall be funded by the transfer of funds from the
Department of Health and Human Services and the Office of Juvenile
Services used to fully fund community-based services and juvenile parole
to the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration.
(2) There shall be established through the use of technology an
information-sharing process to support and enhance the exchange of
information between the Department of Health and Human Services, the
Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration, and the
Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice. It is the
intent of the Legislature to appropriate two hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the General Fund to the Office of Probation Administration
to facilitate the information-sharing process.
-99-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(3) Costs incurred on behalf of juveniles under the Nebraska
Juvenile Service Delivery Project shall be paid as provided in section
43-290.01.
Sec. 66. Section 43-4203, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-4203 (1) The Nebraska Children's Commission shall create a
committee to examine the Office of Juvenile Services and the Juvenile
Probation Agency Juvenile Services Division of the Office of Probation
Administration. Such committee shall review the role and effectiveness of
out-of-home placements utilized in the juvenile justice system, including
the youth rehabilitation and treatment centers, and make recommendations
to the commission on the juvenile justice continuum of care, including
what populations should be served in out-of-home placements and what
treatment services should be provided at the centers in order to
appropriately serve those populations. Such committee shall also review
how mental and behavioral health services are provided to juveniles in
residential placements and the need for such services throughout Nebraska
and make recommendations to the commission relating to those systems of
care in the juvenile justice system. The committee shall collaborate with
the Juvenile Justice Institute at the University of Nebraska at Omaha,
the Center for Health Policy at the University of Nebraska Medical
Center, the behavioral health regions as established in section 71-807,
and state and national juvenile justice experts to develop
recommendations. The recommendations shall include a plan to implement a
continuum of care in the juvenile justice system to meet the needs of
Nebraska families, including specific recommendations for the
rehabilitation and treatment model. The recommendations shall be
delivered to the commission and electronically to the Judiciary Committee
of the Legislature annually by September 1.
(2) The commission shall collaborate with juvenile justice
specialists of the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation
-100-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
Administration and county officials with respect to any county-operated
practice model participating in the Crossover Youth Program of the Center
for Juvenile Justice Reform at Georgetown University.
(3) The commission shall analyze case management workforce issues
and make recommendations to the Health and Human Services Committee of
the Legislature regarding:
(a) Salary comparisons with other states and the current pay
structure based on job descriptions;
(b) Utilization of incentives for persons who work in the area of
child welfare;
(c) Evidence-based training requirements for persons who work in the
area of child welfare and their supervisors; and
(d) Collaboration with the University of Nebraska to increase and
sustain such workforce.
(4) The Foster Care Reimbursement Rate Committee created pursuant to
section 43-4216, the Nebraska Strengthening Families Act Committee
created pursuant to section 43-4716, and the Bridge to Independence
Advisory Committee created pursuant to section 43-4513 shall be under the
jurisdiction of the commission.
(5) The commission shall work with the office of the State Court
Administrator, as appropriate, and entities which coordinate facilitated
conferencing as described in section 43-247.03.
(6) The commission shall work with administrators from each of the
service areas designated pursuant to section 81-3116, the teams created
pursuant to section 28-728, local foster care review boards, child
advocacy centers, the teams created pursuant to the Supreme Court's
Through the Eyes of the Child Initiative, community stakeholders, and
advocates for child welfare programs and services to establish networks
in each of such service areas. Such networks shall permit collaboration
to strengthen the continuum of services available to child welfare
agencies and to provide resources for children and juveniles outside the
-101-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
child protection system.
(7) The commission may organize subcommittees as it deems necessary.
Members of the subcommittees may be members of the commission or may be
individuals who have knowledge of the subcommittee's subject matter,
professional expertise to assist the subcommittee in completing its
assigned responsibilities, or the ability to collaborate within the
subcommittee and with the commission to carry out the powers and duties
of the commission. A subcommittee shall meet as necessary to complete the
work delegated by the commission and shall report its findings to the
relevant committee within the commission.
(8) No member of any committee or subcommittee created pursuant to
this section shall have any private financial interest, profit, or
benefit from any work of such committee or subcommittee.
Sec. 67. Section 43-4206, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-4206 The Department of Health and Human Services and the Juvenile
Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration shall fully cooperate
with the Nebraska Children's Commission. The department shall provide to
the commission all requested information on children and juveniles in
Nebraska, including, but not limited to, departmental reports, data,
programs, processes, finances, and policies.
Sec. 68. Section 43-4304, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-4304 Administrator means a person charged with administration of
a program, an office, or a division of the department or administration
of a private agency or licensed child care facility, the Juvenile
Probation Administrator probation administrator, or the executive
director.
Sec. 69. Section 43-4314, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-4314 Private agency means a child welfare agency that contracts
-102-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
with the department or the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation
Administration or contracts to provide services to another child welfare
agency that contracts with the department or the Juvenile Probation
Agency Office of Probation Administration.
Sec. 70. Section 43-4316, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-4316 Responsible individual means a foster parent, a relative
provider of foster care, or an employee of the department, the Juvenile
Probation Agency juvenile services division, the commission, a foster
home, a private agency, a licensed child care facility, or another
provider of child welfare programs and services responsible for the care
or custody of records, documents, and files.
Sec. 71. Section 43-4318, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-4318 (1) The office shall investigate:
(a) Allegations or incidents of possible misconduct, misfeasance,
malfeasance, or violations of statutes or of rules or regulations of:
(i) The department by an employee of or person under contract with
the department, a private agency, a licensed child care facility, a
foster parent, or any other provider of child welfare services or which
may provide a basis for discipline pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing
Act;
(ii) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, the Juvenile
Probation Agency juvenile services division by an employee of or person
under contract with the Juvenile Probation Agency juvenile services
division, a private agency, a licensed facility, a foster parent, or any
other provider of juvenile justice services;
(iii) The commission by an employee of or person under contract with
the commission related to programs and services supported by the Nebraska
County Juvenile Services Plan Act, the Community-based Juvenile Services
Aid Program, juvenile pretrial diversion programs, or inspections of
-103-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
juvenile facilities; and
(iv) A juvenile detention facility and staff secure juvenile
facility by an employee of or person under contract with such facilities;
(b) Death or serious injury in foster homes, private agencies, child
care facilities, juvenile detention facilities, staff secure juvenile
facilities, and other programs and facilities licensed by or under
contract with the department or the Juvenile Probation Agency juvenile
services division when the office, upon review, determines the death or
serious injury did not occur by chance; and
(c) Death or serious injury in any case in which services are
provided by the department or the Juvenile Probation Agency juvenile
services division to a child or his or her parents or any case involving
an investigation under the Child Protection and Family Safety Act, which
case has been open for one year or less and upon review determines the
death or serious injury did not occur by chance.
(2) The department, the Juvenile Probation Agency juvenile services
division, each juvenile detention facility, and each staff secure
juvenile facility shall report to the office (a) all cases of death or
serious injury of a child in a foster home, private agency, child care
facility or program, or other program or facility licensed by the
department or inspected through the commission to the Inspector General
as soon as reasonably possible after the department or the Juvenile
Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration learns of such death
or serious injury and (b) all allegations of sexual abuse of a state
ward, juvenile on probation, juvenile in a detention facility, and
juvenile in a residential child-caring agency. For purposes of this
subsection, serious injury means an injury or illness caused by suspected
abuse, neglect, or maltreatment which leaves a child in critical or
serious condition.
(3)(a) The Office of Juvenile Services shall report to the office of
Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare as soon as reasonably
-104-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
possible after any of the following instances occur at a youth
rehabilitation and treatment center:
(i) An assault;
(ii) An escape or elopement;
(iii) An attempted suicide;
(iv) Self-harm by a juvenile;
(v) Property damage not caused by normal wear and tear;
(vi) The use of mechanical restraints on a juvenile;
(vii) A significant medical event suffered by a juvenile; and
(viii) Internally substantiated violations of 34 U.S.C. 30301 et
seq.
(b) The Office of Juvenile Services and the office of Inspector
General of Nebraska Child Welfare shall, if requested by either party,
work in collaboration to clarify the specific parameters to comply with
subdivision (3)(a) of this section.
(4) The department shall notify the office of Inspector General of
Nebraska Child Welfare of any leadership changes within the Office of
Juvenile Services and the youth rehabilitation and treatment centers.
(5) With respect to any investigation conducted by the Inspector
General pursuant to subdivision (1)(a) of this section that involves
possible misconduct by an employee of the Juvenile Probation Agency
juvenile services division, the Inspector General shall immediately
notify the Juvenile Probation Administrator probation administrator and
provide the information pertaining to potential personnel matters to the
Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration.
(6) Any investigation conducted by the Inspector General shall be
independent of and separate from an investigation pursuant to the Child
Protection and Family Safety Act. The Inspector General and his or her
staff are subject to the reporting requirements of the Child Protection
and Family Safety Act.
(7) Notwithstanding the fact that a criminal investigation, a
-105-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
criminal prosecution, or both are in progress, all law enforcement
agencies and prosecuting attorneys shall cooperate with any investigation
conducted by the Inspector General and shall, immediately upon request by
the Inspector General, provide the Inspector General with copies of all
law enforcement reports which are relevant to the Inspector General's
investigation. All law enforcement reports which have been provided to
the Inspector General pursuant to this section are not public records for
purposes of sections 84-712 to 84-712.09 and shall not be subject to
discovery by any other person or entity. Except to the extent that
disclosure of information is otherwise provided for in the Office of
Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act, the Inspector General
shall maintain the confidentiality of all law enforcement reports
received pursuant to its request under this section. Law enforcement
agencies and prosecuting attorneys shall, when requested by the Inspector
General, collaborate with the Inspector General regarding all other
information relevant to the Inspector General's investigation. If the
Inspector General in conjunction with the Public Counsel determines it
appropriate, the Inspector General may, when requested to do so by a law
enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney, suspend an investigation by
the office until a criminal investigation or prosecution is completed or
has proceeded to a point that, in the judgment of the Inspector General,
reinstatement of the Inspector General's investigation will not impede or
infringe upon the criminal investigation or prosecution. Under no
circumstance shall the Inspector General interview any minor who has
already been interviewed by a law enforcement agency, personnel of the
Division of Children and Family Services of the department, or staff of a
child advocacy center in connection with a relevant ongoing investigation
of a law enforcement agency.
Sec. 72. Section 43-4319, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-4319 (1) The office shall have access to all information and
-106-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
personnel necessary to perform the duties of the office.
(2) A full investigation conducted by the office shall consist of
retrieval of relevant records through subpoena, request, or voluntary
production, review of all relevant records, and interviews of all
relevant persons.
(3) For a request for confidential record information pursuant to
subsection (5) of section 43-2,108 involving death or serious injury, the
office may submit a written request to the Juvenile Probation
Administrator probation administrator. The record information shall be
provided to the office within five days.
Sec. 73. Section 43-4320, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-4320 (1) Complaints to the office may be made in writing. The
office shall also maintain a toll-free telephone line for complaints. A
complaint shall be evaluated to determine if it alleges possible
misconduct, misfeasance, malfeasance, or violation of a statute or of
rules and regulations pursuant to section 43-4318. All complaints shall
be evaluated to determine whether a full investigation is warranted.
(2) The office shall not conduct a full investigation of a complaint
unless:
(a) The complaint alleges misconduct, misfeasance, malfeasance, or
violation of a statute or of rules and regulations pursuant to section
43-4318;
(b) The complaint is against a person within the jurisdiction of the
office; and
(c) The allegations can be independently verified through
investigation.
(3) The Inspector General shall determine within fourteen days after
receipt of a complaint whether it will conduct a full investigation. A
complaint alleging facts which, if verified, would provide a basis for
discipline under the Uniform Credentialing Act shall be referred to the
-107-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
appropriate credentialing board under the act.
(4) When a full investigation is opened on a private agency that
contracts with the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation
Administration, the Inspector General shall give notice of such
investigation to the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation
Administration.
Sec. 74. Section 43-4321, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-4321 All employees of the department, the Juvenile Probation
Agency juvenile services division as directed by the juvenile court or
the Juvenile Probation Administrator Office of Probation Administration,
or the commission, all foster parents, and all owners, operators,
managers, supervisors, and employees of private agencies, licensed child
care facilities, juvenile detention facilities, staff secure juvenile
facilities, and other providers of child welfare services or juvenile
justice services shall cooperate with the office. Cooperation includes,
but is not limited to, the following:
(1) Provision of full access to and production of records and
information. Providing access to and producing records and information
for the office is not a violation of confidentiality provisions under any
law, statute, rule, or regulation if done in good faith for purposes of
an investigation under the Office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child
Welfare Act;
(2) Fair and honest disclosure of records and information reasonably
requested by the office in the course of an investigation under the act;
(3) Encouraging employees to fully comply with reasonable requests
of the office in the course of an investigation under the act;
(4) Prohibition of retaliation by owners, operators, or managers
against employees for providing records or information or filing or
otherwise making a complaint to the office;
(5) Not requiring employees to gain supervisory approval prior to
-108-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
filing a complaint with or providing records or information to the
office;
(6) Provision of complete and truthful answers to questions posed by
the office in the course of an investigation; and
(7) Not willfully interfering with or obstructing the investigation.
Sec. 75. Section 43-4324, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-4324 (1) In conducting investigations, the office shall access
all relevant records through subpoena, compliance with a request of the
office, and voluntary production. The office may request or subpoena any
record necessary for the investigation from the department, the Juvenile
Probation Agency juvenile services division as permitted by law, the
commission, a foster parent, a licensed child care facility, a juvenile
detention facility, a staff secure juvenile facility, or a private agency
that is pertinent to an investigation. All case files, licensing files,
medical records, financial and administrative records, and records
required to be maintained pursuant to applicable licensing rules shall be
produced for review by the office in the course of an investigation.
(2) Compliance with a request of the office includes:
(a) Production of all records requested;
(b) A diligent search to ensure that all appropriate records are
included; and
(c) A continuing obligation to immediately forward to the office any
relevant records received, located, or generated after the date of the
request.
(3) The office shall seek access in a manner that respects the
dignity and human rights of all persons involved, maintains the integrity
of the investigation, and does not unnecessarily disrupt child welfare
programs or services. When advance notice to a foster parent or to an
administrator or his or her designee is not provided, the office
investigator shall, upon arrival at the departmental office, bureau, or
-109-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
division, the private agency, the licensed child care facility, the
juvenile detention facility, the staff secure juvenile facility, or the
location of another provider of child welfare services, request that an
onsite employee notify the administrator or his or her designee of the
investigator's arrival.
(4) When circumstances of an investigation require, the office may
make an unannounced visit to a foster home, a departmental office,
bureau, or division, a licensed child care facility, a juvenile detention
facility, a staff secure juvenile facility, a private agency, or another
provider to request records relevant to an investigation.
(5) A responsible individual or an administrator may be asked to
sign a statement of record integrity and security when a record is
secured by request as the result of a visit by the office, stating:
(a) That the responsible individual or the administrator has made a
diligent search of the office, bureau, division, private agency, licensed
child care facility, juvenile detention facility, staff secure juvenile
facility, or other provider's location to determine that all appropriate
records in existence at the time of the request were produced;
(b) That the responsible individual or the administrator agrees to
immediately forward to the office any relevant records received, located,
or generated after the visit;
(c) The persons who have had access to the records since they were
secured; and
(d) Whether, to the best of the knowledge of the responsible
individual or the administrator, any records were removed from or added
to the record since it was secured.
(6) The office shall permit a responsible individual, an
administrator, or an employee of a departmental office, bureau, or
division, a private agency, a licensed child care facility, a juvenile
detention facility, a staff secure juvenile facility, or another provider
to make photocopies of the original records within a reasonable time in
-110-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
the presence of the office for purposes of creating a working record in a
manner that assures confidentiality.
(7) The office shall present to the responsible individual or the
administrator or other employee of the departmental office, bureau, or
division, private agency, licensed child care facility, juvenile
detention facility, staff secure juvenile facility, or other service
provider a copy of the request, stating the date and the titles of the
records received.
(8) If an original record is provided during an investigation, the
office shall return the original record as soon as practical but no later
than ten working days after the date of the compliance request.
(9) All investigations conducted by the office shall be conducted in
a manner designed to ensure the preservation of evidence for possible use
in a criminal prosecution.
Sec. 76. Section 43-4326, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-4326 (1) The department shall provide the Public Counsel and the
Inspector General with direct computer access to all computerized
records, reports, and documents maintained by the department in
connection with administration of the Nebraska child welfare system.
(2) The commission shall provide the Inspector General with direct
computer access to all computerized records, reports, and documents
maintained in connection with administration of juvenile justice
services.
(3) The Juvenile Probation Agency juvenile services division, as
directed by the juvenile court or the Juvenile Probation Administrator
Office of Probation Administration, shall provide the Inspector General
with direct computer access to all computerized records, reports, and
documents maintained by the juvenile services division in connection with
a specific case under investigation.
Sec. 77. Section 43-4327, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-111-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
2024, is amended to read:
43-4327 (1) The Inspector General's report of an investigation shall
be in writing to the Public Counsel and shall contain recommendations.
The report may recommend systemic reform or case-specific action,
including a recommendation for discharge or discipline of employees or
for sanctions against a foster parent, private agency, licensed child
care facility, or other provider of child welfare services or juvenile
justice services. All recommendations to pursue discipline shall be in
writing and signed by the Inspector General. A report of an investigation
shall be presented to the director, the Juvenile Probation Administrator
probation administrator, or the executive director within fifteen days
after the report is presented to the Public Counsel.
(2) Any person receiving a report under this section shall not
further distribute the report or any confidential information contained
in the report beyond the entity that is the subject of the report. The
Inspector General, upon notifying the Public Counsel and the director,
the Juvenile Probation Administrator probation administrator, or the
executive director, may distribute the report, to the extent that it is
relevant to a child's welfare, to the guardian ad litem and attorneys in
the juvenile court in which a case is pending involving the child or
family who is the subject of the report. The report shall not be
distributed beyond the parties except through the appropriate court
procedures to the judge.
(3) A report that identifies misconduct, misfeasance, malfeasance,
or violation of statute, rules, or regulations by an employee of the
department, the Juvenile Probation Agency juvenile services division, the
commission, a private agency, a licensed child care facility, or another
provider that is relevant to providing appropriate supervision of an
employee may be shared with the employer of such employee. The employer
may not further distribute the report or any confidential information
contained in the report.
-112-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
Sec. 78. Section 43-4328, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-4328 (1) Within fifteen days after a report is presented to the
director, the Juvenile Probation Administrator probation administrator,
or the executive director under section 43-4327, he or she shall
determine whether to accept, reject, or request in writing modification
of the recommendations contained in the report. The written response may
include corrections of factual errors. The Inspector General, with input
from the Public Counsel, may consider the director's, Juvenile Probation
Administrator's probation administrator's, or executive director's
request for modifications but is not obligated to accept such request.
Such report shall become final upon the decision of the director, the
Juvenile Probation Administrator probation administrator, or the
executive director to accept or reject the recommendations in the report
or, if the director, the Juvenile Probation Administrator probation
administrator, or the executive director requests modifications, within
fifteen days after such request or after the Inspector General
incorporates such modifications, whichever occurs earlier.
(2) After the recommendations have been accepted, rejected, or
modified, the report shall be presented to the foster parent, private
agency, licensed child care facility, or other provider of child welfare
services or juvenile justice services that is the subject of the report
and to persons involved in the implementation of the recommendations in
the report. Within thirty days after receipt of the report, the foster
parent, private agency, licensed child care facility, or other provider
may submit a written response to the office to correct any factual errors
in the report and shall determine whether to accept, reject, or request
in writing modification of the recommendations contained in the report.
The Inspector General, with input from the Public Counsel, shall consider
all materials submitted under this subsection to determine whether a
corrected report shall be issued. If the Inspector General determines
-113-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
that a corrected report is necessary, the corrected report shall be
issued within fifteen days after receipt of the written response.
(3) If the Inspector General does not issue a corrected report
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, or if the corrected report
does not address all issues raised in the written response, the foster
parent, private agency, licensed child care facility, or other provider
may request that its written response, or portions of the response, be
appended to the report or corrected report.
(4) A report which raises issues related to credentialing under the
Uniform Credentialing Act shall be submitted to the appropriate
credentialing board under the act.
Sec. 79. Section 43-4331, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-4331 On or before September 15 of each year, the Inspector
General shall provide to the Health and Human Services Committee of the
Legislature, the Judiciary Committee of the Legislature, the Supreme
Court, and the Governor a summary of reports and investigations made
under the Office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act for
the preceding year. The summary provided to the committees shall be
provided electronically. The summaries shall detail recommendations and
the status of implementation of recommendations and may also include
recommendations to the committees regarding issues discovered through
investigation, audits, inspections, and reviews by the office that will
increase accountability and legislative oversight of the Nebraska child
welfare system, improve operations of the department, the Juvenile
Probation Agency juvenile services division, the commission, and the
Nebraska child welfare system, or deter and identify fraud, abuse, and
illegal acts. Such summary shall include summaries of alternative
response cases under alternative response implemented in accordance with
sections 28-710.01, 28-712, and 28-712.01 reviewed by the Inspector
General. The summaries shall not contain any confidential or identifying
-114-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
information concerning the subjects of the reports and investigations.
Sec. 80. Section 43-4703, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-4703 For purposes of the Nebraska Strengthening Families Act:
(1) Age or developmentally appropriate means activities or items
that are generally accepted as suitable for a child of the same
chronological age or level of maturity or that are determined to be
developmentally appropriate for a child, based on the development of
cognitive, emotional, physical, and behavioral capacities that are
typical for an age or age group and, in the case of a specific child,
activities or items that are suitable for the child based on the
developmental stages attained by the child with respect to the cognitive,
emotional, physical, and behavioral capacities of the child;
(2) Caregiver means a foster parent with whom a child in foster care
has been placed or a designated official for a child-care institution in
which a child in foster care has been placed;
(3) Child-care institution has the definition found in 42 U.S.C.
672(c), as such section existed on January 1, 2016, and also includes the
definition of residential child-caring agency as found in section
71-1926;
(4) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(5) Foster family home has the definition found in 42 U.S.C. 672(c),
as such section existed on January 1, 2017, and also includes the
definition as found in section 71-1901;
(6) Probation means the Juvenile Probation Agency Office of
Probation Administration; and
(7) Reasonable and prudent parent standard means the standard
characterized by careful and sensible parental decisions that maintain
the health, safety, and best interest of a child while at the same time
encouraging the emotional and developmental growth of the child that a
caregiver shall use when determining whether to allow a child in foster
-115-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
care under the responsibility of the state to participate in
extracurricular, enrichment, cultural, and social activities.
Sec. 81. Section 50-1203, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
50-1203 For purposes of the Legislative Performance Audit Act:
(1) Agency means any department, board, commission, or other
governmental unit of the State of Nebraska acting or purporting to act by
reason of connection with the State of Nebraska, including the Juvenile
Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration and the Office of
Public Guardian, but does not include (a) any court, (b) the Governor or
his or her personal staff, (c) any political subdivision or entity
thereof, or (d) any entity of the federal government;
(2) Auditor of Public Accounts means the Auditor of Public Accounts
whose powers and duties are prescribed in section 84-304;
(3) Business day means a day on which state offices are open for
regular business;
(4) Committee means the Legislative Performance Audit Committee;
(5) Committee report means the report released by the committee at
the conclusion of a performance audit;
(6) Legislative Auditor means the Legislative Auditor appointed by
the Executive Board of the Legislative Council under section 50-401.01;
(7) Majority vote means a vote by the majority of the committee's
members;
(8) Office means the office of Legislative Audit;
(9) Performance audit means an objective and systematic examination
of evidence for the purpose of providing an independent assessment of the
performance of a government organization, program, activity, or function
in order to provide information to improve public accountability and
facilitate decisionmaking by parties with responsibility to oversee or
initiate corrective action. Performance audits may have a variety of
objectives, including the assessment of a program's effectiveness and
-116-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
results, economy and efficiency, internal control, and compliance with
legal or other requirements;
(10) Preaudit inquiry means an investigatory process during which
the office gathers and examines evidence to determine if a performance
audit topic has merit;
(11) Tax incentive performance audit means an evaluation of a tax
incentive program pursuant to section 50-1209; and
(12) Working papers means those documents containing evidence to
support the office's findings, opinions, conclusions, and judgments and
includes the collection of evidence prepared or obtained by the office
during the performance audit or preaudit inquiry.
Sec. 82. Section 68-1732, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
68-1732 It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of
Health and Human Services, the State Department of Education, the
Department of Labor, the Office of Probation Administration, the Juvenile
Probation Agency, the Department of Correctional Services, and the
Department of Economic Development will have integrated programs and
policies when serving a common customer. Organizational mergers and
operating agreements shall be developed within state government which
bring together the state's community-based child-serving and family-
serving resources in the areas of health care services, social services,
mental health services, developmental disabilities services, juvenile
justice, and education. Such actions shall eliminate the need for the
public to understand the differing roles, responsibilities, and services
of the agencies enumerated in this section and their affiliates.
Sec. 83. Section 79-303.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-303.01 (1) On or before October 1, 2023, the State Department of
Education, the Department of Health and Human Services, the Office of
Probation Administration, and the State Court Administrator shall enter
-117-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
into a memorandum of understanding for the sharing of data relevant to
students who are under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court. Beginning
on the operative date of this section, the Juvenile Probation Agency
shall succeed to the rights and responsibilities of the Office of
Probation Administration under such memorandum. The purpose for the
sharing of data is to provide systems-wide coordination to improve
educational opportunities and outcomes and to facilitate service
coordination for such students. The memorandum shall include the intent
for the State Department of Education to contract with an outside
consultant with expertise in the education of court-involved students to
assist in the development of such policies and procedures.
(2) The consultant shall provide recommendations addressing issues
that include, but need not be limited to, the following:
(a) Identifying and defining the population of students whose data
should be collected and shared;
(b) Defining the specific types of data to be collected and shared;
(c) Identifying shared data systems;
(d) Identifying the entities and persons for which the data should
be accessible;
(e) Identifying both federal and state legal responsibilities and
confidentiality parameters; and
(f) Developing a uniform approach for the transfer of educational
credits.
(3) The development of such policies and procedures for the sharing
of data shall be collaborative and shall include input from the
appropriate entities including, but not limited to, the State Department
of Education, the Department of Health and Human Services, the Juvenile
Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration, the State Court
Administrator, the juvenile court system, the superintendent of schools
for the youth and rehabilitation centers, public school districts,
educators, and court-involved students and their parents. The consultant
-118-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
shall provide a draft report containing the recommendations described in
subsection (2) of this section to the appropriate agency representatives
and to the Commissioner of Education, the chief executive officer of the
Department of Health and Human Services, and the Chief Justice of the
Supreme Court on or before September 1, 2024.
(4) The State Department of Education shall complete a final report
detailing the recommendations of the consultant and any policies and
procedures that are being considered for adoption by the State Department
of Education, the Department of Health and Human Services, the Juvenile
Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration, and the State Court
Administrator. The report shall be delivered electronically to the Chief
Justice of the Supreme Court, the Governor, and the Clerk of the
Legislature on or before December 1, 2024.
Sec. 84. Section 79-2121, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2121 The superintendents of any school districts that are members
of a learning community shall develop and participate in a plan by August
1, 2011, to reduce excessive absenteeism including a process to share
information regarding at-risk youth with the goal of improving
educational outcomes, providing effective interventions that impact risk
factors, and reducing unnecessary penetration deeper into the juvenile
justice system. For purposes of this section, at-risk youth means
children who are under the supervision of the Juvenile Probation Agency
Office of Probation Administration, are committed to the care, custody,
or supervision of the Department of Health and Human Services, are
otherwise involved in the juvenile justice system, or have been absent
from school for more than five days per quarter or the hourly equivalent
except when excused by school authorities or when a documented illness
makes attendance impossible or impracticable.
Sec. 85. Section 81-1401, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-119-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
81-1401 For purposes of sections 81-1401 to 81-1414.19, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Class I railroad means a rail carrier classified as Class I
pursuant to 49 C.F.R. part 1201 1-1;
(2) Commission means the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and
Criminal Justice;
(3) Council means the Nebraska Police Standards Advisory Council;
(4) Director means the director of the Nebraska Law Enforcement
Training Center;
(5) Felony means a crime punishable by imprisonment for a term of
more than one year or a crime committed outside of Nebraska which would
be punishable by imprisonment for a term of more than one year if
committed in Nebraska;
(6) Handgun means any firearm with a barrel less than sixteen inches
in length or any firearm designed to be held and fired by the use of a
single hand;
(7) Law enforcement agency means the police department or the town
marshal in incorporated municipalities, the office of sheriff in
unincorporated areas, the Nebraska State Patrol, and Class I railroad
police departments;
(8)(a) Law enforcement officer means any person who has successfully
completed an entry-level law enforcement certification from a training
academy and who is responsible for the prevention or detection of crime
or the enforcement of the penal, traffic, or highway laws of the state or
any political subdivision of the state for more than one hundred hours
per year and is authorized by law to make arrests and includes, but is
not limited to:
(i) A full-time or part-time member of the Nebraska State Patrol;
(ii) A county sheriff;
(iii) A full-time or part-time employee of a county sheriff's
office;
-120-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(iv) A full-time or part-time employee of a municipal or village
police agency;
(v) A full-time or part-time Game and Parks Commission conservation
officer;
(vi) A full-time or part-time deputy state sheriff;
(vii) A full-time employee of an organized and paid fire department
of any city of the metropolitan class who is an authorized arson
investigator and whose duties consist of determining the cause, origin,
and circumstances of fires or explosions while on duty in the course of
an investigation;
(viii) A member of a law enforcement reserve force appointed in
accordance with section 81-1438; or
(ix) A full-time Class I railroad police officer;
(b) Law enforcement officer includes a noncertified conditional
officer;
(c) Law enforcement officer does not include employees of the
Department of Correctional Services, probation officers under the
Nebraska Probation System or the Nebraska Juvenile Probation System,
parole officers appointed by the Director of Supervision and Services of
the Division of Parole Supervision, or employees of the Department of
Revenue under section 77-366; and
(d) Except for a noncertified conditional officer, a law enforcement
officer shall possess a valid law enforcement officer certificate or
diploma, as established by the council, in order to be vested with the
authority of this section;
(9) Misdemeanor crime of domestic violence has the same meaning as
in section 28-1206;
(10) Noncertified conditional officer means a person appointed
pursuant to subsection (6) of section 81-1414;
(11) Serious misconduct means improper or illegal actions taken by a
law enforcement officer that have a rational connection with the person's
-121-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
fitness or capacity to serve as a law enforcement officer and includes,
but is not limited to:
(a) Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor crime of domestic
violence;
(b) Fabrication of evidence;
(c) Repeated substantiated allegations of the use of excessive
force;
(d) Acceptance of a bribe;
(e) Commission of fraud or perjury; or
(f) Sexual assault;
(12) Training academy means:
(a) The training center; or
(b) Another council-approved law enforcement training facility
which:
(i) Offers certification training that meets or exceeds the
certification training curriculum of the training center; and
(ii) Is operated and maintained by a law enforcement agency or by
multiple law enforcement agencies pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation
Act;
(13) Training center means the Nebraska Law Enforcement Training
Center; and
(14) Training school means a public or private institution of higher
education, including the University of Nebraska, the Nebraska state
colleges, and the community colleges of this state, that offers training
in a council-approved pre-certification course.
Sec. 86. Section 81-1427, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1427 (1) There is established within the Nebraska Commission on
Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice the position of Director of Juvenile
Diversion Programs to be appointed by the executive director of the
commission.
-122-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(2) The Director of Juvenile Diversion Programs shall be supervised
by the executive director of the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement
and Criminal Justice. The director shall be responsible for fostering,
promoting, researching, and assessing juvenile pretrial diversion
programs and developing new programs in collaboration with cities and
counties pursuant to sections 43-260.02 to 43-260.07. The director shall:
(a) Provide technical assistance and guidance to juvenile pretrial
diversion programs for implementing evidence-based strategies or
standardized, replicable practices that have been researched and have
demonstrated positive outcomes;
(b) Develop a core juvenile pretrial diversion program packet for
utilization by counties without a juvenile pretrial diversion program or
counties without a district juvenile probation officer acting under
section 12 of this act 29-2258;
(c) Establish baseline program guidelines for juvenile pretrial
diversion programs based on evidence-based practices, principles,
programs, and research, develop data collection and evaluation protocols,
oversee statewide data collection, and generate an annual report on
juvenile pretrial diversion programs;
(d) Develop relationships and collaborate with juvenile justice
stakeholders involved in juvenile pretrial diversion programs, provide
education and training as necessary, and serve on boards and committees
when approved by the commission;
(e) Facilitate consistent communication and information-sharing
among juvenile pretrial diversion program directors;
(f) Assist juvenile pretrial diversion program directors, county
attorneys, district juvenile probation officers acting under section 12
of this act 29-2258, and county boards in developing policies and
practices that achieve the goals of quality juvenile pretrial diversion
programs;
(g) Assist in comprehensive community planning efforts as they
-123-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
relate to development of juvenile pretrial diversion programs;
(h) Develop and coordinate a statewide working group as a
subcommittee of the Nebraska Coalition for Juvenile Justice to assist in
regular strategic planning related to supporting, funding, monitoring,
and evaluating the effectiveness of plans and programs receiving funds
from the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program; and
(i) Assist the Director of the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid
Program created under section 43-2404.01 in the review of Community-based
Juvenile Services Aid Program applications as provided in section
43-2404.02.
Sec. 87. Section 83-1216, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1216 (1) The department shall administer the medicaid home and
community-based services waivers upon application approval by the federal
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. The amount of funding for any
person receiving services shall be determined using an objective
assessment process developed by the department and approved by the
federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(2) The department shall provide directly or by contract service
coordination to Nebraska residents found to be eligible for specialized
services.
(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department take all
possible steps to maximize federal funding. All Nebraska residents
eligible for funding for specialized services through the department
shall apply for and accept any federal medicaid benefits for which they
may be eligible and benefits from other funding sources within the
department, the State Department of Education, specifically including the
Division of Rehabilitation Services, and other agencies to the maximum
extent possible.
(4) The priorities for funding the medicaid home and community-based
services waivers under this section are as follows:
-124-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
(a) The first funding priority of the state shall be responding to
the needs of persons with developmental disabilities in immediate crisis
due to caregiver death, homelessness, or a threat to the life and safety
of the person;
(b) The second funding priority of the state in responding to the
needs of persons with developmental disabilities shall be for persons
that have resided in an institutional setting for a period of at least
twelve consecutive months and who are requesting community-based
services;
(c) The third funding priority of the state in responding to the
needs of persons with developmental disabilities shall be for serving
wards of the department or persons placed under the supervision of the
Juvenile Probation Agency Office of Probation Administration by the
Nebraska court system who are transitioning upon age nineteen with no
other alternatives as determined by the department to support residential
services necessary to pursue economic self-sufficiency;
(d) The fourth funding priority of the state in responding to the
needs of persons with developmental disabilities shall be for serving
persons transitioning from the education system upon attaining twenty-one
years of age to maintain skills and receive the day services necessary to
pursue economic self-sufficiency;
(e) The fifth funding priority of the state in responding to the
needs of persons with developmental disabilities shall be, upon approval
by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States
Department of Health and Human Services, for serving a dependent of a
member of the armed forces of the United States who is a legal resident
of this state due to the service member's military assignment in
Nebraska; and
(f) The sixth funding priority of the state in responding to the
needs of persons with developmental disabilities shall be for serving all
other persons by date of application.
-125-

LB684 LB684
2025 2025
Sec. 88. Sections 3, 4, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17,
18, 19, 20, 21, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 37, 38, 40, 41, 42,
44, 45, 46, 47, 48, 49, 50, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58, 59, 60, 61,
62, 63, 64, 65, 66, 67, 68, 69, 70, 71, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79,
80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, 86, 87, 89, and 91 of this act become operative
on July 1, 2026. The other sections of this act become operative on their
effective date.
Sec. 89. Original sections 25-2407, 29-2248, 29-2252.01, 29-2253,
29-2260.01, 29-2260.02, 29-2270, 29-2271, 29-2272, 29-2273, 43-260,
43-290.01, 43-297.01, 43-412, 43-1304, 43-1309, 43-1503, 43-4101,
43-4102, 43-4304, 43-4314, 43-4316, 43-4319, 43-4320, 43-4321, 43-4324,
43-4326, 50-1203, 68-1732, 79-303.01, 79-2121, 81-1401, 81-1427, and
83-1216, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 28-726,
29-2246, 29-2257, 29-2258, 29-2292, 29-4803, 43-247.03, 43-254, 43-258,
43-281, 43-286, 43-286.01, 43-2,108, 43-2,108.05, 43-2,113, 43-425,
43-1302, 43-1303, 43-1311.03, 43-2404.01, 43-2404.02, 43-2411, 43-2412,
43-4203, 43-4206, 43-4318, 43-4327, 43-4328, 43-4331, and 43-4703,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 90. Original sections 43-250 and 43-260.01, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 91. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
43-4307.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 43-1306,
43-4411, 43-4412, 43-4413, 43-4414, 43-4415, and 43-4416, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024.
-126-